_	There is no truth to the statement that the Holy See has named an Official Papal Private Investigator of Garabandal and affirmations attributed to the anonymous personage to the extent that the verification of the Garabandal apparitions lies completely in the hands of Pope Paul VI and other such expressions that aim at undermining the authority of the decisions of the Bishop of Santander are completely unfounded.
_	The 1994 expanded World Health Organization AIDS case definition was introduced in 1994 to incorporate the statement that HIV testing "should" be done.
_	An alternative viewpoint on the microscopic equations is that they are the macroscopic equations "together" with the statement that vacuum behaves like a perfect linear "material" without additional polarisation and magnetisation.
_	where formula_59 is the Lagrangian, the statement formula_60 is equivalent to the statement that, for all formula_61, each coordinate frame trivialization formula_62 of a neighborhood of formula_63 yields the following formula_64 equations:
_	Cobello is also a believer in the statement that “historical interpretation is reserved for the ‘strong’ ”.
_	He labeled it a "Jewish idea" and went on to say that "the Jew is a "me" who speaks as though he were an "I"," that the Jew "suffers from thoughts doubly misformed", thus making him "suitable for the handling of money", and sums up with the statement that "historic creation of Western music" would have developed just as well "without the Jew".
_	Barlow then learned that Deputy Assistant Secretary of Defense Arthur Hughes had delivered testimony to Congress that stated the exact opposite, including the statement that using F-16s to deliver nuclear weapons "far exceeded the state of art in Pakistan," which Barlow knew to be untrue.
_	Even some contemporary American technical journals doubted that such a high speed had been attained: ""Many are disposed to receive with doubt the statement that on 9 May the locomotive No. 999 of the New York Central railroad ran at the speed of 100 miles an hour, or that on a subsequent date she ran a single mile in 32 seconds.""
_	They began with the statement that the questions had been correctly received, read, and considered, and that the corresponding answers had been given in the presence of the gaon and with his approval.
_	The historian Avrom Saltman suggests that, if admissions were spaced regularly throughout William's abbacy, Theobald would have become a monk in about 1117, but qualifies his estimate with the statement that 1117 "seems to be rather late".
_	In a 2015 survey, 70% of Britons agreed with the statement that “things are worse than they used to be,” even though at the time Britons were in fact “richer, healthier and longer-living than ever before.”
_	Arguing as in Example 3. above and using the Zariski-Samuel theorem, it is easy to check that Hungerford's theorem is equivalent to the statement that any special principal ring is the quotient of a discrete valuation ring.
_	However, some scientists continued to voice their support in spite of Galton's and Weismann's results: notably, in 1900 Karl Pearson wrote that pangenesis "is no more disproved by the statement that ‘gemmules have not been found in the blood,’ than the atomic theory is disproved by the fact that no atoms have been found in the air."
_	He claimed later that reports of Israeli and Indian involvement in Zia's plane-crash were only speculations and he rejected the statement that was given by former president Ghulam Ishaq Khan that the presidential plane was blown up in the air.
_	The appellate court found that the judge's jury instructions, which included the statement that the labor of research by an author is protected by copyright, had been given in error.
_	Then the second and third conditions may be replaced by the statement that "DU" – "UD" = "rI" (where "I" is the identity).
_	John Oman, in his review of the satire in section 1.12 of the Chandogya Upanishad, states, "More than once we have the statement that ritual doings only provide merit in the other world for a time, whereas the right knowledge rids of all questions of merit and secures enduring bliss".
_	Theodore Hirsch concludes his biography with the statement that because of the atrocities Casimir committed, so far no biographer had written a balanced description of his life.
_	"Rosh Amanah" ends with the statement that "Maimonides compiled these articles merely in accordance with the fashion of other nations, which set up axioms or fundamental principles for their science".
_	This property is called Gauss's law for magnetism and is equivalent to the statement that there are no isolated magnetic poles or magnetic monopoles.
_	The consultation paper for the government's Digital Economy Strategy, released May 10, 2010, included the statement that "Governments can help by making publicly-funded research data more readily available to Canadian researchers and businesses".
_	The most famous example of incongruity in these books occurs in Book III., Chapter xvii., in which it is attributed to Constantius, the bishop of Cyprus, the statement that the sacred images were to be given supreme adoration due to the Holy Trinity.
_	At first the band thought that there are already enough great CDs being released nowadays but changed their view and came to the statement that there are also a lot of bad CDs being released on the market.
_	In April 1939, Freiman explained his response to Nazi treatment of Jews, with the statement that “The only solution to Jewish suffering is Zionism.
_	His wife said in the statement that there had been difficult times in their relationship and that he has faults, but that she also appreciated his strengths.
_	When in it is read that in the synagogue at the Pisidian Antioch, in close connection with the statement that through believing in Christ a man is justified, Paul cited another passage of Habakkuk (), denouncing unbelieving despisers, indicating to the Pulpit Commentary that he had made good his statement about justification by alleging this same probative text.
_	Now validity has to do with the logical form of the statement that makes up the argument.
_	The word text has its origins in Quintilian's book on speeches, with the statement that "after you have chosen your
_	During the ensuing campaign, King's tuberculosis, which he believed he had contracted while living in Paris, denied him the active behind-the-scenes role that he might otherwise have played, although he worked hard to assure his region's voters with the statement that New Hampshire's Pierce was a "northern man with southern principles."
_	He published several volumes of sermons, compiled from various sources, which are prefaced by the statement that the ‘penuria studentium’ had moved him to make this compilation ‘de micis quas collegi quæ cadebant de mensis dominorum meorum, Januensis, Parisiensis, Lugdunensis, Odonis, et cæterorum.
_	The BBC broadcast the statement that evening, but in a form unsatisfactory to Oan, who considered it to be truncated and incorrect.
_	In graph theory, a branch of mathematics, the handshaking lemma is the statement that every finite undirected graph has an even number of vertices with odd degree (the number of edges touching the vertex).
_	14% strongly agree with the statement that they trust their administrator or supervision.
_	The defendant's testimony included the statement that: "After subpoenas were served in the case against me, I learned of Guava LLC's and Prenda Law's practice of finding one John Doe to be a named defendant, and then discovering the names of and requesting settlement money from other John Does by issuing subpoenas to ISPs."
_	The trace is a map of Lie algebras formula_33 from the Lie algebra "gl" of operators on a "n"-dimensional space ( matrices) to the Lie algebra "k" of scalars; as "k" is abelian (the Lie bracket vanishes), the fact that this is a map of Lie algebras is exactly the statement that the trace of a bracket vanishes:
_	Some few hours later, the delay was confirmed, as Pete Hines issued the statement that "Oblivion PS3 is now a Q1 2007 title".
_	Finally, the statement that U.S. patent law is without extraterritorial application occurs universally in cases holding that liability for patent infringement under U.S. law should not be based on acts and conduct occurring outside the United States.
_	This is equivalent to the statement that the polynomial ring is a free module over the ring of radical polynomials.
_	The Cosmos article included the statement that "Drastic, precipitous—and, especially, unilateral—steps to delay the putative greenhouse impacts can cost jobs and prosperity and increase the human costs of global poverty, without being effective.
_	The middle chapters that later became "Peter Pan in Kensington Gardens" are set in London's famous Kensington Gardens, introduced by the statement that "All perambulators lead to Kensington Gardens".
_	"Any account of this first Book Wagon work...would be incomplete without the statement that this method of rural library extension has been adopted in many states in the Union, and that new book wagons are being put in operation each year."
_	Article I of the 1883 Harmand Treaty had contained the offensive phrase 'including China' ("y compris la Chine") in the statement that France would henceforth control Vietnam's relations with other countries.
_	The obit of David Farannan, together with the statement that he was legatus, has apparently come into the annals from some unknown and rather late source"”.
_	This is equivalent to the statement that the ring of all polynomials is a free module over the ring of radical polynomials.
_	Later he made the statement that he wrote as a therapy, such as with "Zelfportret met gesloten ogen"
_	In the Italian Renaissance, the idea of the polymath was expressed by Leon Battista Alberti (1404–1472) in the statement that "a man can do all things if he will".
_	The 2010 survey also showed that 52% disagreed with the statement that wind farms are "ugly and a blot on the landscape".
_	The book was copyrighted to Smyth but issued with the statement that "reproduction in whole or in part is authorized and permitted".
_	It also said of the statement that "Syria's people and leadership and army express their deep appreciation for the national, populist movement in Egypt which has yielded a great achievement."
_	In addition, it was preceded by the statement that it only operated "in the event that the [...]
_	To further enforce this each episodes starts with a short introduction monologue from Nick Crane which begins with the statement that ""Coast" is home".
_	They included none of what are commonly regarded as guarantees of political human rights except the statement that "men and women are equal in every respect."
_	This follows from the somewhat stronger statement that every conjugate permutable subgroup is subnormal, which in turn follows from the statement that every maximal conjugate permutable subgroup is normal.
_	Jensen's inequality generalizes the statement that the secant line of a convex function lies "above" the graph of the function, which is Jensen's inequality for two points: the secant line consists of weighted means of the convex function (for "t" ∈ [0,1]),
_	Especially noteworthy is the statement that R. Simon Gamaliel, together with R. Johanan b. Zakkai, addressed a circular letter to the Galileans and other communities ("Liḳḳuṭe Mekilta," p. 30), a statement which certainly antedates the parallel passage in Tosef., Sanh. ii.
_	However, according to Downham (2007) "none of these details can be relied upon" as "there is no contemporary evidence to support the statement that [Amlaib's] father was called Gofraid" the "Fragmentary Annals" having been compiled at an uncertain date, possibly as early as the 11th century.
_	The report concluded with the statement that "We are not sure what was the main reason behind Apple's decision to source two different modem suppliers for the newest iPhone".
_	Schopenhauer ends the appendix with the statement that "by expounding these paradoxical ideas, I wanted to grant to the professors of philosophy a small favour.
_	But what if the defendant is the person who made the statement that is now being offered against him?
_	Among memorable recent quotes, Neild, rebuffing Blair’s claims about Saddam Hussein's alleged biological weapons, wrote: 'To say that the UN inspectors found "enough to have killed the world's population several times over" is equivalent to the statement that a man in his prime can produce a million sperm any day, therefore he can produce a million babies a day.
_	Careful investigation justifies the statement that including both day's battles, the Indian losses will number forty warriors, while their wounded on the opposite bank of the river may increase this number."
_	"Your article... needs only one paragraph more to make it complete, and that is the statement that parallelism belongs to Indian poetry as well to Finnish…
_	The most famous happening of the joint assembly of bishops and priests in September 1971 however, saw the passage by a majority, but not the requisite two-thirds majority for formal acceptance, of the statement that;
_	After President John F. Kennedy was shot in 1963, he was brought to Parkland Memorial Hospital, where Shires was then chief of surgery, and it was Shires who issued the statement that the president had been dead on arrival at the hospital.
_	The film ends with images of children dancing in a ring accompanied by the statement that the Allies will remain until they can be sure that the next generation will represent "a Germany of light and life and freedom...truth, tolerance and justice".
_	In 1949, the First Presidency under the direction of George Albert Smith made a declaration which included the statement that the priesthood restriction was divinely commanded and not a matter of church policy.
_	The opinion for the Court, by Justice Elena Kagan, included several Spider-Man references, concluding with the statement that "with great power there must also come—great responsibility".
_	It has often been assumed that the statement that the book was "written in "Fleta"" means that it was written during the author's confinement in the Fleet prison.
_	In the decimal number system, completeness is equivalent to the statement that any infinite string of decimal digits is actually a decimal representation for some real number.
_	This is the famous butterfly effect, which is equivalent to the statement that formula_128 losses differentiability in this limit.
_	It is not necessary to give the particulars of the long days and sleepless nights that preceded the termination of the sad affair; it is sufficient to say that Mr. Mack affirms the statement that everything within the power of skillful medical attention and careful nursing was done to relieve the sufferer.
_	Activists spoke up about the issue immediately, causing the President of the Olympics Committee, Dmitry Chernyshenko, to issue the statement that, "I confirm that we do not involve any orcas or dolphins for the Olympics."
_	For a given cardinal number formula_1 and a stationary set formula_2, formula_3 is the statement that there is a sequence formula_4 such that
_	IV, 2, § i), arguing that "the statement that a thing is what it is, is prior to the statement that it is not another thing" ("Nouv. Ess." IV, 7, § 9).
_	Manuel Godoy was made universal heir in her will, with the statement that he had shared their exile and lost his property for it.
_	He agrees with the statement that phobias generally concern objects that constitute a direct threat to human survival, and that many of these phobias are quickly acquired because of an "inherited biological preparedness".
_	Ramsey's theorem is equivalent to the statement that the class of all finite sets is a Ramsey class.
_	Axiom F is in turn equivalent to the statement that for any formula φ with parameters there are arbitrarily large inaccessible ordinals α such that "V" reflects φ (in other words φ holds in "V" if and only if it holds in the whole universe) .
_	Setting formula_16, this inequality is equivalent to the statement that the matrix given by
_	He concludes the fourth chapter with the statement that, with very rare exceptions, the poetical parts of the Bible have neither meter nor rhyme.
_	Members were asked to disagree, agree, or agree with provisos with the statement that read: "Taken as a whole, government policies of the New Deal served to lengthen and deepen the Great Depression".
_	According to theologians, the statement that the ""land of Judah"" will terrify the Egyptians is not a reference to a large army from Judah attacking Egypt, but a circumlocution for the place where God lives; it is God and his plans that will terrify Egypt.
_	The belief that unrestricted submarine warfare would starve Britain and bring about its demise was predicted, with the statement that the United Kingdom will be forced to sue for peace within six months.
_	In July 2013, Rakočević decided not to play for Crvena zvezda the following season, with the statement that he would play abroad one more season, or would retire, and become the sports director of the team.
_	The document ends with the statement that "we are inclined not to discredit entirely this somewhat spectacular theory [extraterrestrial origins], meantime keeping an open mind on the subject".
_	Their entry then goes on to describe their choruses as "chant-worthy" and that the singles from this album "ravaged hearts and minds across the globe", ending with the statement that they "linger forever in the hearts of true music lovers".
_	The article included the statement that "several other employees say they also brought their complaints and concerns about Mr. Friedman to Ms. Bloomfield.
_	In order to accomplish this, Quine makes the statement that there is a so-called holophrastic indeterminacy, which tells that there are always multiple translations of one sentence, .
_	As of November 30, 2015, both the "Associated Press" and the "New York Times" noted that they would no longer use "Rodham" in referring to Clinton, with the AP stating that "the campaign says to go with Hillary Clinton", and the New York Times providing the statement that:
_	The older Beatrice is the one referred to throughout "A Series of Unfortunate Events" by Lemony Snicket as his deceased love, and her identity as the mother of the Baudelaire children from the series is revealed in "The Beatrice Letters", but the younger Beatrice's identity is not directly explained, apart from the statement that she also has some connection to Violet, Klaus, and Sunny (although in "The End" it is revealed that she is the daughter of Kit Snicket).
_	This is equivalent to the statement that pcf(pcf("A"))=pcf("A").
_	I've always been comfortable with the statement that hunters don't use assault rifles.
_	which we recognise as the statement that formula_109 i.e. that formula_110 is a cocycle taking values in formula_111
_	Andrae writes that "[i]f epilepsy is to denote only those severe attacks which involve serious consequences for the physical and mental health, then the statement that Mohammad suffered from epilepsy must be emphatically rejected."
_	On the other hand, the statement that every filter is contained in an ultrafilter does not imply AC.
_	1. However, the logic of the inductive step is incorrect for "n" = 1, because the statement that "the two sets overlap" is false (there are only "n" + 1 = 2 horses prior to either removal, and after removal the sets of one horse each do not overlap).
_	The idiom is found in Nicholas Udall's translation of "The first tome or volume of the Paraphrase of Erasmus vpon the newe testamente" (1548) in the statement that "The Sophistes of Grece coulde through their copiousness make an Elephant of a flye, and a mountaine of a mollehill."
_	Sometimes this effect is expressed by the statement that "random thermal motion around room temperature can usually overcome or disrupt them" (which refers to the electrostatic component of the van der Waals force).
_	A study published on 24 June 2004, even yield a result of 55% of Spaniards agreeing (""más bien de acuerdo"") with the statement that "the Monarchy has overstayed its welcome."
_	The requirement that be holomorphic on is equivalent to the statement that the exterior derivative on .
_	Carmichael's totient function conjecture is the statement that there is no such .
_	In theoretical physics, a unitarity bound is any inequality that follows from the unitarity of the evolution operator, i.e. from the statement that probabilities are numbers between 0 and 1 whose sum is conserved.
_	Those four examples can be rephrased as the statement that the following are Gelfand pairs:
_	A physical law or a law of physics is a statement "inferred from particular facts, applicable to a defined group or class of phenomena, and expressible by the statement that a particular phenomenon always occurs if certain conditions be present."
_	An "American Telephone Journal" account of the December 21 alternator-transmitter demonstration included the statement that "It is admirably adapted to the transmission of news, music, etc. as, owing to the fact that no wires are needed, simultaneous transmission to many subscribers can be effected as easily as to a few", echoing the words of a handout distributed to the demonstration witnesses, which stated "[Radio] Telephony is admirably adapted for transmitting news, stock quotations, music, race reports, etc. simultaneously over a city, on account of the fact that no wires are needed and a single apparatus can distribute to ten thousand subscribers as easily as to a few.
_	Despite the statement that no guest artists were used to record the album, Bowie did use some of the musicians he's worked with in the past, including Earl Slick, who recorded his parts for the album in July 2012.
_	(The Weierstrass gap theorem or Lückensatz is the statement that there must be formula_11 gaps.)
_	Rush Limbaugh said the brawl was "hip-hop culture on parade" and also added the statement that ""NBA uniforms are now in gang colors.
_	Protagoras begins his discourse with the statement that a good Sophist can make his students into good citizens.
_	The idea of a proximate cause was expressed negatively in "R v Mubila", with the statement that there must be no "novus actus interveniens" between X's conduct and Y's death, as well as positively, in the contention that Y's death must follow directly from X's conduct.
_	This ruling came from the Madras High Court, with the statement that amongst the Hindus, the Gandharva form of marriage was obsolete (as of 1930).
_	The unusual high volatility of the metal compound nickel tetracarbonyl led Kelvin with the statement that Mond had "given wings to the heavy metals".
_	Therefore, the statement that every square matrix "A" can be put in Jordan normal form is equivalent to the claim that there exists a basis consisting only of eigenvectors and generalized eigenvectors of "A".
_	Note that the quantity is different from , and only the latter one can be used to calculate average volume, and that the statement that ⟨R⟩ goes as relies on being zero; but because nucleation is a separate process from growth, this places outside the bounds of validity of the equation.
_	The gospel never actually mentions the number of Magi, but most western Christian denominations have traditionally assumed them to have been three in number, based on the statement that they brought three gifts.
_	Likewise, he objected that the statement that "The only book in front of me is red" does not entail the sensory statement "Redness would probably appear to me were I to seem to myself to see a book", because redness is not likely to appear under a blue light-bulb.
_	Over 80% of polled parents agreed with the statement "Sex education in school makes it easier for me to talk to my child about sexual issues," while under 17% agreed with the statement that their children were being exposed to "subjects I don't think my child should be discussing." 10 percent believed that their children's sexual education class forced them to discuss sexual issues "too early."
_	The theology of the Holy Sativan Church was based off a literal interpretation of the statement that "Opium is the religion of the masses".
_	In reference to the statement that the Jews “exploit” the Holocaust for their own purposes, the same study indicates that this view is more prevalent amongst Swedes than amongst Americans and the British but equally as prevalent amongst Austrians and the French.
_	The University Student Agreement (the statement that the University agreed would be the principles of an MMU education) says that “staff will give reasonable notice of changes to the teaching timetable and will arrange for classes to be re-scheduled or for alternative delivery of the content, or will explain why this is not possible”.
_	On 2 March 2009, deputy chief of Russia’s General Staff Anatoly Nogovitsyn issued the statement that the human remains that Georgia had returned, belonged to the pilot of a TU-22 reconnaissance bomber shot down during the war.
_	Elements of "" appear as well: the statement that the palace and its chambers will dissolve into light shows that "matter and light are interchangeable" (one of the reasons that Destruction abandoned his realm and responsibilities); Destruction also plays a "creator" role (elsewhere, he suggests that he and his siblings are both themselves and their polar opposites); Desire provokes distrust and hatred in Dream's heart; Death is declared inevitable (a reference to "The Illusion Of Permanence" in "Brief Lives"); and Delight's speech is already that of Delirium.
_	In 1994, he was a signatory of the statement that launched the Scottish campaign for the retention of Clause IV, which in turn led to the creation of the Campaign for Socialism.
_	On December 1, the release date for the album was announced, along with the statement that it would be the last studio album by the group.
_	Mill distinguishes between happiness and contentment, claiming that the former is of higher value than the latter, a belief wittily encapsulated in the statement that "it is better to be a human being dissatisfied than a pig satisfied; better to be Socrates dissatisfied than a fool satisfied.
_	The book concludes with the statement that "Above all, let your voice be heard loudly and often, in protest against indifference, ignorance, and avarice responsible for the uncontrolled adulteration and misrepresentation of foods, drugs, and cosmetics."
_	The external tactics pointed to the Treaty of Guarantee as the first objective of an attack, with the statement that it was no longer recognized by Greek Cypriots.
_	The existence of some formal power series with nonzero constant coefficient, such that , is another equivalent to the statement that these polynomials form an Appell sequence.
_	Nazi uniforms and insignia, and features a character who makes the statement that Nazi Germany was the "most efficient society" ever created, it was considered unfit for entertainment in Germany.
_	The film ends with the statement that the killer has not been captured.
_	In this form, the Cauchy–Riemann equations can be interpreted as the statement that "f" is independent of the variable formula_36.
_	While Zia had blocked the shariah courts ability to ban interest with Article 203B, he had also added Article 2A (also known as the Objectives Resolution) to the constitution, which included the statement that Muslims' lives should be ordered "in the individual and collective spheres in accordance with the teachings and requirements of Islam as set out in the Holy Quran and Sunnah."
_	A 2004 NPR survey indicated that the majority of the 1001 parent groups polled wanted complete sex education in schools, as over 80% agreed with the statement "Sex education in school makes it easier for me to talk to my child about sexual issues", and under 17% of polled parents agreed with the statement that their children were being exposed to "subjects I don't think my child should be discussing".
_	The website closes with the statement that someday American whites will be a minority and will be subject to the same form of violence.
_	A March 2014 episode of the American program "Hannity" featured Moore making the statement that the Earth "has not warmed for the last 17 years" in a debate with pundit Bob Beckel.
_	Clinton ended a televised speech with the statement that he "did not have sexual relations" with Lewinsky.
_	King added that at once "there came to mind the statement that I had made to Parliament in June [1942] about the action the government would necessarily take if we were agreed that the time had come when conscription was necessary".
_	However, in this form the principle is tautological, since the meaning of the statement that the cardinality of set is greater than the cardinality of set is exactly that there is no injective map from to .
_	It concluded with the statement that "If you cannot place them in the care of neighbours, it really is kindest to have them destroyed."
_	Amaleki's last writing was the statement that the small plates were full () and from this point there were no further additions to the small plates.
_	According to Judith B. Rosenfeld of the "Knoxville News-Sentinel", Naylor makes the statement that children raised in healthy families make ethical choices and ultimately thrive.
_	In the study of graph algorithms, Courcelle's theorem is the statement that every graph property definable in the monadic second-order logic of graphs can be decided in linear time on graphs of bounded treewidth.
_	In their report, they included the statement that "These plans may undergo some modification in the hands of the person to whom their execution shall be intrusted.")
_	In a 2015 white paper, UNSCEAR stated its findings from 2013 remain valid and largely unaffected by new information, and the new information further supports the statement that high thyroid detection is likely due to more intensive screening.
_	Journey was the subject of an episode of VH1's "Behind the Music" in 2001, where Perry made the statement that he "never really felt like [he] was part of the band," to which former manager Herbie Herbert reacted saying "that's like the Pope saying he never really felt Catholic."
_	To the statement that the Kansas science standards had nothing to do with intelligent design but were only about teaching evolution in a "balanced" way, Borofsky responded: "It really is ID in disguise.
_	The similar cultural and linguistic affinity of the Misings of the Brahmaputra valley and several other ethnic groups of Arunachal Pradesh especially the Adi community supports the statement that they migrated to Brahmaputra valley in search of fertile land for cultivation.
_	The function of [the statement] 'It's true that...' is to agree with, accept, or endorse the statement that 'it's raining.'"
_	On 30 November 2016 early investigation had led to the statement that most of the fires reported had been arson attacks.
_	He took the initiative of drafting the statement that would be read at the 50th anniversary ceremony of WWII.
_	In 1958 a plaque was installed on the university campus crediting "9XM-WHA" as "The Oldest Station in the Nation", including the statement that the station began "broadcasting on a regular schedule in 1919".
_	Note that the empty set is a subset of every set (the statement that all elements of the empty set are also members of any set "A" is vacuously true).
_	It is equivalent to the statement that magnetic monopoles do not exist.
_	In 1996, the Government adopted the "White Paper on National Defence", which included the statement that, "In accordance with the Constitution, the SANDF shall not discriminate against any of its members on the grounds of sexual orientation."
_	For instance, the Sylvester–Gallai theorem, stating that any non-collinear set of points in the plane has an "ordinary line" containing exactly two points, transforms under projective duality to the statement that any arrangement of lines with more than one vertex has an "ordinary point", a vertex where only two lines cross.
_	Like the Ferguson video, the video features t-shirts sold by FCKH8 and the statement that $5 from the sale of each shirt will be donated to five related causes.
_	His personal plagiarism case files contain the statement that the case, in Capps’ own words, was "the most outrageous case of plagiarism in the history of this country”.
_	Afterwards he made the statement that "You can grow enough marijuana in an average window box to drive the entire population of Toledo stark, raving mad".
_	In the chapter dealing with logical and linguistic relations, the "Sambandha-samuddeśa", Bhartrhari discusses several statements of a paradoxical nature, including "sarvam mithyā bravīmi" "everything I am saying is false" which belongs to the liar paradox family, as well as the paradox arising from the statement that something is unnameable or unsignifiable (in Sanskrit: "avācya"): this becomes nameable or signifiable precisely by calling it unnameable or unsignifiable.
_	Matthew adds the statement that "... then he will reward each person according to what he has done" between the two.
_	Mr. Steele is authority for the statement that Colonel Beverly Mayer, of Columbia, Pennsylvania, who, as a civil engineer of what was then the Pennsylvania Central Railway, had laid out the tracks in the yards of the newly projected city, named the place Altoona after the city of Altona in Danish Holstein, which became part of Germany in 1864."
_	According to dynamics, this leads to the statement that the levels on which the laser should operate, must be in the k-space relatively to each other.
_	Velocity is a vector quantity which expresses both the object's speed and the direction of its motion; therefore, the statement that the object's velocity is constant is a statement that both its speed and the direction of its motion are constant.
_	After a flurry of news reports, Drew Hamill, a spokesman for Pelosi, made the statement that "Father Conroy has responded to additional questions" and "the leader sees no obstacle to him being named chaplain."
_	This includes the statement that paintings should be created by using very expressive brush strokes.
_	UTHR eventually retracted the statement that the victim had known the naval persons previously.
_	It is impossible here to substantiate with proofs the statement that I have here made about Mr. Hammond's case.
_	European Union diplomatic chief Federica Mogherini issued the statement that EU praised the summit between US President Donald Trump and North Korean leader Kim Jong-un.
_	The United Nations Special Torture Rapporteur was quoted for the statement that the Indian guarantees that the man will not be tortured are worthless.
_	Although the statement that channels 1, 5, 9, and 13 are "non-overlapping" is limited to spacing or product density, the concept has some merit in limited circumstances.
_	The Jerusalem Talmud is also the authority for the statement that Elisha played the part of an informer during the Hadrianic persecutions, when the Jews were ordered to violate the laws of the Torah.
_	In 1981, the Dutch Parliament approved a declaration which included the statement that animals have intrinsic value to be protected for its own sake rather than the benefit of humans, though it is unclear what the implications of this declaration are in practice.
_	Russia condemned NATO at the United Nations and supported the statement that NATO air strikes on Serbia were an illegal military action.
_	Currying is the statement that the tensor product and the internal Hom are adjoint functors; that is, for every object formula_53 there is a natural isomorphism:
_	One of the earlier "modifications" is the statement that Ephrem's father was a pagan priest of Abnil or Abizal.
_	A particular effort was made to involve non-traditional museum users: participants in 8 out of 10 focus groups were selected on the basis of their ethnic diversity, their lack of educational qualifications, and their agreement with the statement that "I wouldn't be seen dead in a museum or arts centre".
_	When Chagla asked if the statement that he was prevented from visiting is incorrect, Qutbuddin said, "I don<nowiki>'t agree.
_	This tension was revived by the hacking saga of Qatar News Agency and the statement that was attributed to Sheikh Tamim bin Hamad, which Qatar falsified later.
_	Everett stated that for a composite system – for example a subject (the "observer" or measuring apparatus) observing an object (the "observed" system, such as a particle) – the statement that either the observer or the observed has a well-defined state is meaningless; in modern parlance, the observer and the observed have become entangled; we can only specify the state of one "relative" to the other, i.e., the state of the observer and the observed are correlated "after" the observation is made.
_	Moreover, rather than 'dominating over others', "will to power" is more accurately positioned in relation to the subject (a mere synecdoche, both fictitious and necessary, for there is "no doer behind the deed," (see "On the Genealogy of Morals")) and is an idea behind the statement that words are "seductions" within the process of self-mastery and self-overcoming.
_	This information could be helpful to everyone because it lends evidence to the statement that a quiet environment is the best environment for people to learn or commit any sort of information to memory.
_	After meeting William Ewart Gladstone in 1888, Coubertin asked him whether he agreed with the statement that the "renaissance britannique" was due to Arnold's educational reforms, a thesis that astonished Gladstone, though he did tell Coubertin that: "Your point of view is quite new, but...it is right".
_	Thus, making the statement that the speaker in Sonnet 128 is not only attracted to the woman, but the woman's musical talent is part of her attraction.
_	Yet this is rendered by Creighton as Mahler catching 'a severe feverish chill', and the statement that he 'suffered all his life from these infections'.
_	Other claims about Leibowitz's teachers – that he studied composition with Maurice Ravel and conducting with Pierre Monteux – have been discounted by some writers in the present century, although as recently as 2010 in a study mainly focused on American composers Deborah Fillerup Weagel repeated the statement that Leibowitz was a pupil of Webern and Ravel.
_	For the specific case of an electrical network, it is sometimes phrased as the statement that voltages and currents at different points in the network can be interchanged.
_	A jurat differs from an acknowledgement in that a jurat lacks the statement that the instrument is the act or deed of the party executing it.
_	The founding of Halicarnassus is debated among various traditions; but they agree in the main point as to its being a Dorian colony, and the figures on its coins, such as the head of Medusa, Athena or Poseidon, or the trident, support the statement that the mother cities were Troezen and Argos.
_	Robert Winter, D.D., Bradbury's descendant, is responsible for the statement that there had been a plot to assassinate him, and that the spy who was sent to Fetter Lane was converted by Bradbury's preaching.
_	The first theorem relating standard proofs and probabilistically checkable proofs is the statement that NEXP ⊆ PCP[poly("n"), poly("n")], proved by .
_	The book begins with the statement that "...this country is traveling to its destruction."
_	The perfection of permutation graphs is equivalent to the statement that, in every sequence of ordered elements, the length of the longest decreasing subsequence equals the minimum number of sequences in a partition into increasing subsequences.
_	This is equivalent to the statement that "V" contains a nonzero vector "v" that is a common (simultaneous) eigenvector for all formula_3.
_	In another study of 5,000 first year students at 93 institutions, White students were more likely to agree with the statement that "racial discrimination is no longer a problem" than students of color.
_	This is based largely on the seemingly erotic connotations of their biographies that appeared in "Children's Friend"; for example, the statement that while the couple was working on Primary matters, "when they were too tired to sit up any longer they put on their bathrobes and crawled into bed to work until the wee small hours of the night".
_	An insight into Ahaz's neglect of the worship of the Lord is found in the statement that on the first day of the month of Nisan that followed Ahaz's death, his son Hezekiah commissioned the priests and Levites to open and repair the doors of the Temple and to remove the defilements of the sanctuary, a task which took 16 days.
_	Note that the second condition is equivalent to the statement that the ideal of null sets is formula_22-complete.
_	Even if each of the "X" is nonempty, the Cartesian product may be empty if the axiom of choice (which is equivalent to the statement that every such product is nonempty) is not assumed.
_	Late 13th and 14th century sources suggest that Boniface based his claim to Thessalonica on the statement that his younger brother Renier had been granted Thessalonica on his marriage to Maria Komnene in 1180.
_	It introduces the topic of ecology to Catholic social teaching with the statement that by man's "ill-considered exploitation of nature he risks destroying it and becoming in his turn the victim of this degradation" (21).
_	The prime number theorem is equivalent to the statement that the th prime number satisfies
_	The statement that came from the administration -- and the embassy is the administration -- the statement that came from the administration was a statement which is akin to apology.
_	A survey of 400 individuals, with 98 individuals positively identified as Native Americans, found that 67% agreed with the statement that "Redskins" is offensive and racist.
_	In the same survey, 66% of respondents agreed with the statement that homosexuality should be accepted by society, while 28% believed that homosexuality should not be accepted by society.
_	Many of the claims in "From Emperor to Citizen", like the statement that it was the Kuomintang who stripped Manchuria bare of industrial equipment in 1945-46 rather than the Soviets, together with an "unreservedly rosy picture of prison life", are widely known to be false, but the book was translated into foreign languages and sold well.
_	The Philippine protesters delivered the statement that "this time is not the time for politics, but it is the time to save people."
_	The volume can be judged by the statement that Raigarh itself is consuming about 20,000 tons of coal per day.
_	The book opens with the statement that "war no longer exists"; that is, war as "battle in a field between men and machinery" or "a massive deciding event in a dispute in international affairs" is unlikely to happen again.
_	The power of the warlords continues to be emphasized in the rest of the film and is summarized by the statement that they never adopted the moral or ethical principles that went with the ideas they borrowed and that all information is filtered down to the Japanese people, having been first approved and altered to suit the purposes of the warlords.
_	This was confirmed by the Emperor Conrad on 1 April 1027, with the statement that the jurisdiction of the bishop extended four miles from the city.
_	For this reason, according to him, the statement that the Japanese Constitution is the world's only pacifist constitution is incorrect.
_	Despite sources stating that he was released the next day, Grissom disagrees with the statement that he was there for two days.
_	To compensate for the lack of a table of chords, mathematicians of Aristarchus' time would sometimes use the statement that, in modern notation, sin "α"/sin "β" < "α"/"β" < tan "α"/tan "β" whenever 0° < β < α < 90°, now known as Aristarchus's inequality.
_	The Minister of Innovation, Science and Economic Development introduced Bill C-25 which amended the "Canada Business Corporations Act" and "Canada Cooperatives Act" to allow more online tools to be used to disseminate required information to shareholders in their notice and access systems, to require certain types of corporations to disclose to shareholders the composition of their boards and senior management, as well as their diversity policies or the statement that they do not have a diversity policy.
_	The study of snarks had its origin in the 1880 work of P. G. Tait, who at that time had proved that the four color theorem is equivalent to the statement that no snark is planar.
_	The film opens with the statement that the people of Troy must once a month sacrifice a maiden lest a sea monster destroy their city.
_	In 2012 the band was listed by Revolver under the most anticipated albums of 2012, with Danny Worsnop giving the statement that the general sound of the album will be a "...musical baby of Mötley Crüe and Slipknot."
_	The 2010 survey also showed that 52% disagreed with the statement that wind farms are "ugly and a blot on the landscape".
_	In an American Family Association questionnaire from 2016, Bacon disagreed with the statement that "Governments should pay to develop wind and solar energy solutions until they are economically feasible."
_	Yet some reviewers tempered that criticism with an admission of the merits of Bloom's writing: for example, Fred Matthews, an historian from York University, began an otherwise relatively critical review in the "American Historical Review" with the statement that Bloom's "probes into popular culture" were "both amusing and perceptive" and that the work was "a rich, often brilliant, and disturbing book".
_	In 1998 the DOE declassified the statement that "The fact that materials may be present in channels and the term 'channel filler,' with no elaboration", which may refer to the polystyrene foam (or an analogous substance).
_	34.6 percent of respondents said they agreed with the statement that global financial power is in the hands of Jews, while 17.5 percent agreed that the Jews should all go back to Israel.
_	Take formula_33 then the statement that formula_34 for some formula_24 is equivalent to saying that the decimal expansion of formula_1 has run of three zeros or three nines somewhere.
_	Cartan–Hadamard theorem is the statement that a connected, simply connected complete Riemannian manifold with non-positive sectional curvature is diffeomorphic to R via the exponential map; for metric spaces, the statement that a connected, simply connected complete geodesic metric space with non-positive curvature in the sense of Alexandrov is a (globally) CAT(0) space.
_	In the letter Beach stated that he, Wilson and others were guests at Norton's table when Norton made the statement that the only reason Hibbins was executed was because she had more wit than her neighbors, thus implying her innocence.
_	In 2013, a Pew Research Center poll showed that 73% of adult Filipinos agreed with the statement that "homosexuality should be accepted by society," up by nine percentage points from 64% in 2002.
_	The Maes–Garreau law is the statement that "most favorable predictions about future technology will fall within the Maes–Garreau point", defined as "the latest possible date a prediction can come true and still remain in the lifetime of the person making it".
_	It further mentioned in the statement that the NLD could take legal action against Thein Lwin for violating party rules regarding asking permission to participate in organizations independent of the party.
_	can be considered somewhat analogous to the statement that φ holds "almost everywhere".
_	Bede seems to identify three phases of settlement: an exploration phase, when mercenaries came to protect the resident population; a migration phase, which was substantial, as implied by the statement that "Anglus" was deserted; and an establishment phase, in which Anglo-Saxons started to control areas, implied in Bede's statement about the origins of the tribes.
_	which is precisely the statement that "B" is elliptic.
_	For the period between September 1–14, the airline experienced a 16.1% drop in revenue, indicating to some that the new fee backfired, although the airline maintains the statement that the decrease was due to the pilot strike, and "other seasonal effects".
_	8) supposes that after "de-Rabbanan" the word "Sabura'e" should be inserted, as a chronicle under the title "Seder 'Olam de-Rabbanan Sabura'e" is mentioned by Baruch b. Isaac of Worms ("Sefer ha-Terumah," Hilkot "Abodah Zarah," § 135) and by Moses of Coucy ("Sefer Miẓwot Gadol," ii. 866), in connection with the statement that the year 4564 (= 804 C.E.) was a Sabbatical year.
_	In classical science, it is most typically the statement that there is "no effect" of a particular treatment; in observations, it is typically that there is "no difference" between the value of a particular measured variable and that of a prediction.
_	He began his book with the statement that too many people have accepted uncritically what he called the "Nuremberg Thesis", that the Second World War was the result of criminal conspiracy by a small gang comprising Hitler and his associates.
_	Linnaeus' description is imprecise, and could refer to "practically any hermit crab", but the type locality (the Mediterranean Sea), together with the statement that it lives in worm tubes, restricts the possibilities to this one species.
_	An example is Rota's basis conjecture, the statement that a set of "n" disjoint bases in a rank-"n" matroid can be arranged into an "n" × "n" matrix so that the rows of the matrix are the given bases and the columns are also bases.
_	The SSHRC reason for the rejection included the statement that "Nor did the committee consider that there was adequate justification for the assumption in the proposal that the theory of Evolution, and not Intelligent Design theory, was correct".
_	The preamble of the constitution included the statement that
_	The simplest non-trivial case — i.e., with more than one variable — for two non-negative numbers and , is the statement that
_	Lindelöf's lemma is also known as the statement that every open cover in a second-countable space has a countable subcover (Kelley 1955:49)
_	Babel’s opinion on either side is very ambiguous, but he does make the statement that what happened after the Bolshevik Revolution may not have been the best thing for Russia."
_	Viewed using calculus, the circle transition function "T" is simply a function between open intervals, which gives a meaning to the statement that "T" is differentiable.
_	When the ring is a field, the Cayley–Hamilton theorem is equivalent to the statement that the minimal polynomial of a square matrix divides its characteristic polynomial.
_	She is faithful to the text and does not hesitate to render conscientiously those details that the uninitiated may find bewildering: for instance, the statement that Boris's mother pronounced his name with a stress on the "o" – an indication to the Russian reader of the old lady's affectation."
_	Gauss's law for magnetism is equivalent to the statement that the field lines have neither a beginning nor an end:
_	His strategy "to win at any cost" led him to call on Franklin D. Roosevelt Jr. to attack Hubert Humphrey as a draft dodger; Roosevelt eventually did make the statement that Humphrey avoided service.
_	Naively, the statement that a formula φ logically implies a formula ψ depends on every model of φ; these models will in general be of arbitrarily large cardinality, and so logical consequence cannot be effectively verified by checking every model.
_	Contradictory to the statement that the aliens seen are speaking Interlac is the text that can be seen on the signs in the background of the panels.
_	While he admitted to "erratic behavior" and to the statement that Griffith had asked to get out of the vehicle, he claimed she changed her mind when he pulled into the Chick-fil-A parking lot.
_	Moses ben Maimon, a Jewish philosopher of the 12th Century, demonstrates the problem of describing God with positive attributes, which would include the attribute of omnipotence or the statement that "God is sovereign."
_	This entry is followed by the statement that Dúngal's cousin, Muiredach mac Ainbcellaig, became king of the Cenél Loairn, and it seems probable that the rise of Muiredach, and Dúngal's epithet, stem from his doings on Tory Island.
_	It was also declared in the statement that the association of the name "Chung Cheng" is out of pure coincidence.
_	Translate this to a statistical alternative hypothesis and proceed: "Because H expresses the effect that we wish to find evidence for, we often begin with H and then set up H as the statement that the hoped-for effect is not present."
_	The first chapter opens with the statement that human mind is influenced by memories and "Prana" (vital breath, inner life-force).
_	The justice page of the UCC homepage reports the statement that "Doing justice, seeking peace and building community are central to the identity of the United Church of Christ," although no formal resolution of synod has ever made this declaration of denominational identity.
_	The axiom of choice is equivalent to the statement that the product of a collection of non-empty sets is non-empty.
_	Some idea of the capacity of the North Union Station is gained by the statement that six hundred trains depart from this station every day in the year."
_	71% of Malaysians agree with the statement that Barisan Nasional's "race-based affirmative action policy is obsolete and must be replaced with a merit-based policy", the survey poll was conducted by the independent Merdeka Centre between 18 June 2008 and 29 July 2008, the result showed that up to 65 per cent of Malays who were asked the question agreed that race-based affirmative action should be done away, compared with 83 per cent of Chinese and 89 per cent of Indian respondents.
_	While it depicts a positive energy and excitement of the crowds at the 1970 women's march and rally, the film makes the statement that in spite of various attempts to codify equality, for example, the UN General Assembly Bill of Rights of 1979, the statistics related to gender inequality show that areas such as education, earnings, poverty and abuses still need effective change.
_	All that can be safely said is that there is no proof of any Dál Riata kingdom till the commencement of the sixth century, and that the account given by Boece and Buchanan of Fergus, the son of Ferchard, and his successors, is as devoid of historical foundation as the statement that "his coming into Albion was at the time when Alexander the Great took Babylon, about 330 years before the birth of Christ".
_	(emphasis in original) yet dismissed it (p. 135) – "female ejaculation is an erroneous but widespread concept", and even twenty years later in 1982, they repeated the statement that it was erroneous (p. 69–70) and the result of "urinary stress incontinence".
_	Lovell began his recommendations with the statement that the first requisite was to make the position of a medical officer such that he would place some value upon the retention of his office, at that time held in low esteem.
_	A 2009 poll by Harris Interactive found that 39% of Americans agreed with the statement that "God created the universe, the earth, the sun, moon, stars, plants, animals, and the first two people within the past 10,000 years", yet only 18% of the Americans polled agreed with the statement "The earth is less than 10,000 years old".
_	Mike Lockwood and Claus Fröhlich reject the statement that the warming observed in the global mean surface temperature record since about 1850 is the result of solar variations.
_	Michael Rutter has observed, "Many people made a mistake in going from a statement which is undoubtedly true—that there is no evidence that autism has been caused by poor parenting—to the statement that it has been disproven.
_	The controversy later resurfaced when the cast appeared at the 65th Golden Globe Awards ceremony, which saw Washington ridiculing homosexuality during an interview, following the statement that denied the occurrence of an on-set incident.
_	After reading your magnificent script, Mr. Goldwyn and I both wish to go on record with the statement that if "The Unholy Garden" isn't the finest motion picture Samuel Goldwyn has ever produced, the fault will be entirely ours.
_	Both, however, repeat the statement that Adams decided in 2000 that "everyone should spell it the same way [one word, no hyphen] from then on."
_	In terms of group theory, the assertion that there are no color singlet gluons is simply the statement that quantum chromodynamics has an SU(3) rather than a U(3) symmetry.
_	However, Nick Higham seems to agree with Bede, who identified three phases of settlement: an exploration phase, when mercenaries came to protect the resident population; a migration phase, which was substantial as implied by the statement that "Anglus" was deserted; and an establishment phase, in which Anglo-Saxons started to control areas, implied in Bede's statement about the origins of the tribes.
_	There are no records as to the date of the erection of the diocese but a letter of Pope St. Gregory the Great is authority for the statement that about the year 600 the newly elected deacon John was appointed bishop of Bagnoregio, the earliest extant mention of a bishop of the see, but he was doubtlessly not the first bishop.
_	Applying the formal definition from above, the statement that "f"("x") = "O"("x") is equivalent to its expansion,
_	In the case of fields, the IBN property becomes the statement that finite-dimensional vector spaces have a unique dimension.
_	Ştefănescu cited its main subject of contention as being the statement that capitalism was inherently hostile toward art, whereas communist states nurtured creativity in order to create a "New Man".
_	Hosseini's translations have been criticized as being too ponderous for the common reader; whereas being works of literature in their original form, Hosseini has always defended his unique translations with the statement that he has striven to create " an equivalent literary masterpiece in Persian" while remaining faithful to the original work.
_	A spokesperson for Barbara Poma, the owner of the Pulse nightclub, called the statement that Mateen had been a regular patron "untrue and totally ridiculous".
_	In the statement that Condorcet criterion is stronger than the majority criterion, the word "criterion" must be understood as a criterion that a "voting system" may or may not satisfy, not as a criterion that a "candidate" must satisfy in order to win the election.
_	The memo concludes with the statement that "if the President were presented with H.R. 1947, his senior advisors would recommend that he veto the bill."
_	A well known fallacy is the false proof of the statement that "all triangles are isosceles".
_	Most of the Mark account is found also in the Matthew and Luke versions, with the exception of the statement that Jesus was "with the wild animals."
_	The "if" part of the lemma is simply the statement that the composition of two measurable functions is measurable.
_	Solanas demanded a retraction of the statement that she was an actress.
_	He likens the statement that a scientific fact has been ascertained to a statement of the type "'someone recognizes something,'" a statement meaningless without further context.
_	Another typical example is the statement that "there are two different groups of order 4 "up to" isomorphism", or ""modulo" isomorphism, there are two groups of order 4".
_	A half-truth deceives the recipient by presenting something believable and using those aspects of the statement that can be shown to be true as good reason to believe the statement is true in its entirety, or that the statement represents the whole truth.
_	Since the solution to the Kepler conjecture establishes that identical balls must leave ≈25.95% of the space empty, Ulam's conjecture is equivalent to the statement that no other convex solid forces that much space to be left empty.
_	He noted in particular the statement that "Exodus no longer promises to make you straight", which he disputed, and the failure to note that Janet Boynes is listed as a resource on Exodus's website.
_	In mathematics, Minkowski's theorem is the statement that any convex set in formula_1 which is symmetric with respect to the origin and which has volume greater than formula_2 contains a non-zero integer point.
_	In 1834, a petition from Cape Town merchants asking for the creation of a British colony at Natal was met by the statement that the Cape finances would not permit the establishment of a new dependency.
_	One of Baumgartner's results is the consistency of the statement that any two formula_1-dense sets of reals are order isomorphic (a set of reals is formula_1-dense if it has exactly formula_1 points in every open interval).
_	Moore claimed that Bradley did not understand the statement that something is real.
_	To protect against critics who might question the legitimacy of this work coming from a twelve-year-old boy, the statement that “sometimes his writing seems abnormally mature….[but] he has no awareness of [his] unusual ability and doesn’t seem to have any instinct for showing off” is given in the introduction.
_	Similarly, the casual use of 1/0 = ∞ is invalid, since the transfer principle applies to the statement that division by zero is undefined.
_	Li Deyu went as far as inducing Liu Zhen's secretary Zheng Qing (鄭慶) into making the statement that whenever Liu Congjian received letters from Niu and Li Zongmin, he would read them and then burn them.
_	Granting Stone tenure had the negative effect of provoking attacks on her work and credibility by powerful conservative faculty within the RTF department, which for years has responded to inquiries with the statement that there is no New Media program or program called ACTLab within the department.
_	In February 2006, Georgia withdrew from the Council of Defense Ministers, with the statement that "Georgia has taken a course to join NATO and it cannot be part of two military structures simultaneously", but it remained a full member of the CIS until August 2009, one year after officially withdrawing in the immediate aftermath of the Russo-Georgian War.
_	To the name of Silvanus it adds the statement that his body was stolen by the Novatians ("hunc Silvanum martyrem Novatiani furati sunt").
_	When the Bill was presented in the 1844 Parliamentary session, it contained the statement that "Messrs John and William Johnson are in possession of and claim to be entitled as mortgagees or assignees to the said Plymouth and Dartmoor Railway ... "
_	His pointed reply to the other Wyndham included the statement that
_	Part of the criticism of "Webb v Outtrim" by the majority was by reference to the statement that "The American Union, on the other hand, has erected a tribunal which possesses jurisdiction to annul a Statute upon the ground that it is unconstitutional"
_	She also wrote in the statement that the agreements that were entered "are now known to be ‘Unauthorised’".
_	And because they lie about us, and falsely attribute to us the statement that God has a son, is no reason for us to lie about them and say that they are idolaters ...
_	Moslet praised the series' diverse set of characters, concluding with the statement that "At a time of confusion and intolerance, it seems more important than ever" for content creators to embrace diversity and reject intolerant attitudes.
_	In metric geometry, the Cartan–Hadamard theorem is the statement that the universal cover of a connected non-positively curved complete metric space "X" is a Hadamard space.
_	For example, in reference to Auschwitz, Roth mocks my God with the statement that “the best that God could possibly do was to permit 10,000 Jews a day to go up in smoke.”
_	In contrast, Lauren Jack, member of Harvard University's Cheerleading squad, made the statement that cheerleading is "all about trying to get everyone else excited about your causes, so it's perfect for political activism."
_	Another contradiction lies in the statement that since the 16th century the kings were mere puppets of the Yogam and Pillamar.
_	Huan Xuan was so struck by the statement that he fell prostrate on the ground, fearing that Sima Daozi would kill him, and from this point he bore a grudge against the prince.
_	On Tim Allen's sitcom "Last Man Standing", on ABC, Allen's wife attempts to prove there are no ghosts at work by explaining how frictional contact mechanics caused a cold glass to slide spontaneously across a counter, finishing with the statement that "it's your basic Stribeck curve".
_	Nevertheless, this statement about my counterpart is still held to ground the truth of the statement that I might have been a banker.
_	In 1872 Alcock's was behind the statement that <nowiki>'</nowiki>"To further the interests of the Association in Scotland, it was decided that during the current season, a team should be sent to Glasgow to play a match v Scotland"<nowiki>'</nowiki> in the FA's minutes of 3 October 1872.
_	His argument begins with the statement that the three traditional laws of thought are "samples of self-evident principles".
_	(This was later retconned with the statement that he did so because he couldn't support his family.)
_	A dependence atom is an expression of the form formula_1, where formula_2 are terms, and corresponds to the statement that the value of formula_3 is functionally dependent on the values of formula_4.
_	The axiom of choice is equivalent to the statement that ≤ or ≤ for every "A", "B".
_	"A" is the first virial coefficient, which has a constant value of 1 and it makes the statement that at low molar density, all fluids behave like ideal gases.
_	In this notation, Clifford's theorem is the statement that for an effective special divisor "D",
_	He begins the Prologue to his "Isopes Fabules" with the statement that 'Wisdom is more in price than gold in coffers' but turns that to mean that beneath the 'boysterous and rurall' fable hide valuable lessons for life, so anticipating the Cock's eventual find.
_	Barwick CJ noted: "...in my opinion, the statement that the imposition of this tax threatens or impairs the independence of the State is, as a statement of a legal conclusion, unwarranted".
_	I have distinguished authority for the statement that sixty or more of the corporations created by a special act for each, by the last Legislature, could have been created and organized under general laws.
_	It generalizes the statement that the determinant of a product of square matrices is equal to the product of their determinants.
_	The article starts out with the statement that the first accordion was copied from a Demian instrument, and later, Demian invented many different scale systems, but only later French models had some buttons in the second row being divided in the middle.
_	In 1998, the DOE declassified the statement that "The fact that materials may be present in channels and the term 'channel filler,' with no elaboration", which may refer to the polystyrene foam (or an analogous substance).
_	The editor of the Yalḳuṭ used some portions of this midrash which are now missing, although it may be assumed that not all the sentences which he included in his work with the statement that they were taken from this midrash were really a part of the Midrash Mishle which he had at hand (comp. S. Buber, "Midrash Mishle," Introduction, p. 5b).
_	This pattern has been long-recognized and can be broadly summarized with the statement that "most species are rare".
_	The court declared the statement that "Jews were gassed to death at the Auschwitz Concentration Camp in Poland during the summer of 1944" was a fact.
_	In his Fourteen Points Programme for World Peace, US President Woodrow Wilson included the statement that non-Turkish minorities of the Ottoman Empire should be "assured of an absolute unmolested opportunity of autonomous development".
_	It is equivalent to the statement that the Gödel universe, "L", up to stage α, yields a model formula_45 of KP + formula_58-separation.
_	Broussard did not directly account for those discrepancies, repeating the statement that "this gentleman's mother died on that Friday before I came on the show."
_	He also made the statement that "enemy targets are under surveillance".
_	believed the statement that eventually
_	One can make the statement that "anything" is a specific word where "everything" can be seen as a general word.
_	The ACNC was unable to comment due to privacy reasons but they issued the statement that it "had been revoked 'following a review into the organisation’s operations and activities'."
_	Possibly through some misreading of the title-page, this work has been attributed by some to a Francis Austen, and there is apparently no foundation for the statement that it was published originally in 1631 and again in 1657.
_	Most respondents agreed with the statement that "[P]overty reduction is imperative to ensuring that Vietnam becomes an advanced, developed country.
_	Historical in this story is the statement that these two sects denied the immortality of the soul and resurrection.
_	In other words, the presence of TS is the algebraic version of the statement that continuous-time flow preserves continuity of formula_55.
_	Rhimes issued the statement that:
_	Responding with an open letter to Morris Dees, president of the SPLC, Horowitz stated that his reminder that the slaves transported to America were bought from African and Arab slavers was a response to demands that only whites pay blacks reparations, not to hold Africans and Arabs solely responsible for slavery, and that the statement that he had denied lingering racism was "a calculated and carefully constructed lie."
_	This is just the statement that the preimage of an open set is open.
_	This message was also followed by the statement that BuyBlue's data had been donated to the organization Advomatic.
_	The concept of "relative rest" is closely linked to that of inertial observers and the statement that "nothing is at absolute rest" is loosely equivalent to stating that there are no frames of reference which are truly inertial.
_	The Fredholm alternative is the statement that, for every non-zero fixed complex number formula_9, either the first equation has a non-trivial solution, or the second equation has a solution for all formula_10.
_	The Qur'anic verse on Ezra appears in one of Maimonides's discussions about the relationship between Judaism and Islam where he says “…they [Muslims] lie about us [Jews], and falsely attribute to us the statement that God has a son.
_	At the end of the book, Wieland makes his satirical intent clear with the statement that although Abdera had long since disappeared, the Abderites still exist and are to be found in every town and city in Germany.
_	Former U.S. Defense Secretary Robert McNamara refers equivocally to the statement that "war is cruelty and you cannot refine it" in both the book "Wilson's Ghost" and in his interview for the film "The Fog of War".
_	We finally have obtained the statement that
_	In a poll done by the Israel Democracy Institute, a majority of Jewish Israelis (53%) said they agreed with the statement that "any Palestinian who has perpetrated a terror attack against Jews should be killed on the spot."
_	I have several times since publicly corrected the statement that General Albert Pike was the author of the poem.
_	The introductory chapter includes the statement that “skeeing is the most exhilarating, most fascinating, most healthful and most delightful of all the winter sports, and that, indulged in sensibly and not to excess, it is indeed an ideal outdoor pastime for everybody young and old.
_	In 1775, the Royal Academy of Sciences in Paris made the statement that the Academy "will no longer accept or deal with proposals concerning perpetual motion."
_	One of his messages was the statement that "as we leave this mountaintop, help us to hold on to the spirit of fellowship and the oneness of our family."
_	The 6th-century historian Procopius is the earliest authority for the statement that Helena was a native of Drepanum, in the province of Bithynia in Asia Minor.
_	Newspapers printed verbatim the statement that Preece had given at the inquest, and they described her as a "fair-haired seventeen-year-old schoolgirl."
_	But all past truths are now necessary truths; therefore it is now necessarily true in the past, prior and up to the original statement "A sea battle will not be fought tomorrow", that the battle will not be fought, and thus the statement that it will be fought is necessarily false.
_	Respondents, by a margin of 4 to 1 (63% to 16%) opposed "Israel’s unilateral withdrawal from a section of Gaza and northern Samaria and forcing 10,000 Israeli Jews from their homes and businesses" and by a margin of 2.5 to 1 (53% to 21%), agreed with the statement that "this Gaza Plan sends a message that Arab terrorism is being rewarded."
_	A ring is a Bézout domain if and only if it is an integral domain in which any two elements have a greatest common divisor that is a linear combination of them: this is equivalent to the statement that an ideal which is generated by two elements is also generated by a single element, and induction demonstrates that all finitely generated ideals are principal.
_	Less than 10% of US adults disagreed with the statement that chiropractors were trustworthy.
_	All six factions of the Austrian parliament signed up to the statement that also emphasizes the responsibility of Austria-Hungary, as an ally of the Ottoman Empire during World War I, in the Armenian Genocide.
_	It was described in the statement that Davis’ hatred towards women played an important role in the reason behind the murder.
_	One example of the BC 38 device was received from the Wa Pruef 7/IV unit, together with the statement that Boris Hagelin was working in America.
_	In a 1995 survey, 64% of U.S. Catholics said they disapproved of the statement that "abortion is morally wrong in every case".
_	He took part in a public debate with two teachers from the Tabora Boys' School, in which he argued against the statement that "The African has benefitted more than the European since the partition of Africa"; after winning the debate, he was subsequently banned from returning to the school.
_	His 2008 campaign website includes the statement that "The federal government spends too much money, squanders precious resources on questionable projects pushed by special interests, and ignores the priorities of the American taxpayer."
_	Sakayanya then expounds the nature of human life, starting with the statement that "Artha is Anartha", or "objects of senses are in truth worthless", that a soul that craves and attaches to hedonistic pleasures never reaches its highest potential.
_	The second part of the work begins with the statement that Jehoiachin, who reigned only three months and ten days, was carried into captivity by Nebuchadnezzar.
_	This is just an application of the statement that any two projective varieties are projectively equivalent if they are congruent modulo the projective linear group (with the field over which the projective space is defined).
_	Gleckner concluded his analysis with the statement that the poem "The Human Abstract", as a whole, is “a remarkably ambitious experiment in progressive enrichment, and a revealing document for the study of Blake's two contrary states of the human soul.
_	Students were shown to strongly support the statement that “One can live well in America” and also disagreed that family background was the most important factor in determining mobility.
_	Its objects were indicated in the statement that “any man can belong to the Brotherhood who will promise to pray daily for the spread of the Kingdom of Christ among men and to make an earnest effort each week to bring at least one man within the hearing of the Gospel.”
_	Ohalot Chapter 7 opens with a discussion of corpse impurity in a "נפש אטומה" ('solid monument')and closes with the statement that a baby whose head has emerged from the womb may not be killed to save the mother because "אין דוחין נפש מפני נפש" ('one soul may not be set aside in favor of another').
_	This informed the court’s decision that assignment of perjury on the statement that was unclear and, which the appellant was not asked to clarify was wrong.
_	On 1 August 2011, Qassem attended a ceremony for the eighth edition of his book, where he made the statement that "Billions of dollars have been offered to us to rebuild the deprived south Lebanon and in return to surrender our arms and stop the work of the resistance.
_	In the following season, the results were: 2003–04 – 4th, 2004–05 – 2nd, 2005–06 – 4th and 2006–07 – 6th with the statement that in 2005 the team missed the promotion in the last minute after finishing at the same number of points (65) with Jiul Petroșani.
_	His syllogism then ends with the statement that God has made the world perfectly in all ways.
_	The latter issued on this occasion in front of a large number of "Gauleiter" the statement that "the German people did not have the inner strength they were perceived to have" and therefore were losing the war.
_	However, on May 16, "Newsweek" retracted the statement that the abuse had been uncovered by an "internal military investigation." after the source of the story was later unable to confirm where he had seen the information.
_	Great unrest answered Grävell's words, as the National Assembly was directly confronted with the statement that the Regent's power originated from the states, "not" the revolution.
_	They also said in the statement that "Philippine forests still harbor many rare and unique species, found nowhere else in the world".
_	In the parliament of 1529 he was knight of the shire for Kent, and it was he who gave point to the complaints of the commons against the spiritualty with regard to probates of wills by the statement that he had paid to Wolsey and Archbishop Warham a thousand marks as executor to Sir William Compton.
_	The court expressed negatively the idea of a proximate cause, with the statement that there must be no "novus actus interveniens" between X's conduct and Y's death; it also expressed it positively, in the contention that Y's death must follow directly from X's conduct.
_	Members were asked to either "disagree", "agree", or "agree with provisos" with the statement that read: "Taken as a whole, government policies of the New Deal served to lengthen and deepen the Great Depression."
_	This date is consistent with the statement that Jotham of Judah began to reign in Pekah's second year, 750 BC (), and that Jotham's successor Ahaz began to reign in his 17th year, 735 BC ().
_	The two sentences do not differ in their contents, the singular proposition expressed by the statement that Superman/Clark Kent is a wimp, but by some implicitly referred to way of taking the proposition.
_	It was in the midst of his sickness that he wrote his novel, "Barbara", while suffering from the fickleness of his lover, Estrid Bannister, and the collection provides a letter-by-letter account of the writing of the novel, ending in his last letter with the statement that three chapters still wait to be written.
_	During a visit to Paris, she met William Randolph Hearst who congratulated her with the statement that he wished he could have the same market share in his country that she had in hers.
_	This was the statement that made bass socially acceptable, which they had not been before.
_	The author makes the statement that after the attacks, settlers were allowed to kill any Sioux that was found in a settlement and that no settler left their home without their rifle.
_	Another example is the statement that if you add 1 to a number you get a bigger number:
_	This is summarized in the statement that a data vault stores "a single version of the facts" (also expressed by Dan Linstedt as "all the data, all of the time") as opposed to the practice in other data warehouse methods of storing "a single version of the truth" where data that does not conform to the definitions is removed or "cleansed".
_	On the other hand, German "Stormbringer" gave this album 2.5/5 stars, praising the band's technicality and will to successfully break through the autistic Serbian metal scene, but criticized the band with the statement that the album was not a unique piece of metal, musically speaking.
_	The Dinitz conjecture on the completion of partial Latin squares may be rephrased as the statement that the list edge chromatic number of the complete bipartite graph equals its edge chromatic number, . resolved the conjecture by proving, more generally, that in every bipartite graph the chromatic index and list chromatic index are equal.
_	Then, the (graded) PBW theorem can be reformulated as the statement that, under certain hypotheses, this final morphism is an isomorphism "of commutative algebras".
_	Theorem is the statement that, for a given integer "n" > 2, the set of all nonzero "n" powers of the integers is a sum-free subset.
_	The passage contains two important features: first, the statement that the letters of Origen to Philip and his family were still extant in Jerome's time; and second, a strong affirmation of Philip's Christianity.
_	The axiom of choice is equivalent to the statement that given two sets "X" and "Y", either |"X"| ≤ |"Y"| or |"Y"| ≤ |"X"|.
_	Examples range from the discovery that the presence of humans tends to sexually arouse ostriches, to the statement that black holes fulfill all the technical requirements to be the location of Hell, to research on the "five-second rule", a tongue-in-cheek belief that food dropped on the floor will not become contaminated if it is picked up within five seconds.
_	becoming Prime Minister, Harper began to distance himself from the statement that October.
_	Some Western powers also disapproved of Cuban linkage; for example, the French government issued the statement that it was inappropriate "the Namibian people should serve as hostages" to broader US foreign policy goals.
_	In this context "strong approximation" is the statement that "S" when reduced generates the full group of points of "G" over the prime fields with "p" elements, when "p" is large enough.
_	For any two functions formula_26 and formula_27 we denote by formula_28 the statement that for all but finitely many formula_29.
_	Hedetniemi's conjecture is then equivalent to the statement that each complete graph is multiplicative.
_	This privilege vastly empowered the entire general sejm (of which the Senate was a part) instead of just the Senate; its crucial part was the statement that no law could be passed without the approval of the entire sejm.
_	Since Euclid's postulate is equivalent to the statement that the sum of the internal angles of a triangle is 180°, he considered both the hypothesis that the angles add up to more or less than 180°.
_	Up to changing variables, this is the statement that the function formula_110 is the best linear approximation to "f" at "a".
_	Another Ottawa biking website concurs with the statement that winter cyclists do not "...ride [their] best or expensive bicycle in winter", but adds that riders do not ride a poor-quality "...piece of junk [bike]", as this type of cycle will be "...slow, heavy, uncomfortable and continually breaking down"; instead, a "...used ‘mid’ level bike" is recommended.
_	More generally if κ is an infinite cardinal, then a κ-Kurepa tree is a tree of height κ with more than κ branches but at most |α| elements of each infinite level α<κ, and the Kurepa hypothesis for κ is the statement that there is a κ-Kurepa tree.
_	At this point, the writing team was provided with a document titled "FUN AND LEARNING IN DRAGON LAND: A Writer’s Guide to Dragon Tales Educational Content" which provided directives as to which curriculum should be included within the stories, such as "emotional challenges > understanding other people’s emotions > recognizing and labeling feelings in others" and the statement that "CURRICULUM IS PARAMOUNT!"
_	In these cases nothing is revealed except the statement that the monotony, the detection of the same trendy genre and stylistic standards in all of the compared national literatures (for example, a panoramic post-war novels in the manner of epic by Aleksey Tolstoy on the whole territory of the USSR and the Soviet bloc in Eastern Europe).
_	It has a short proof in a more powerful system: in fact it is easily provable in Peano arithmetic together with the statement that Peano arithmetic is consistent (which cannot be proved in Peano arithmetic by Gödel's incompleteness theorem).
_	Amongst others these tweaks will have the effect of modifying Euclid's second postulate from the statement that line segments can be extended indefinitely to the statement that lines are unbounded.
_	which is the shorthand way of writing the statement that divides (evenly) the quantity , or, put another way, the remainder after dividing by the integer is 1.
_	On September 9, 2008, the Red Line Citizens' Advisory Council voted unanimously to adopt its first report to the General Assembly, which included the statement that "Preparation of a SDEIS [Supplemental Draft Environmental Impact Statement] should begin now, as a collaborative effort between the MTA and the public in finding the best ways to invest over a billion dollars in Baltimore's transportation infrastructure in keeping with the vision of the 2002 Plan."
_	He resigned from the body in July 2000 at the age of 60 in order to spend more time on his business affairs saying in the statement that, "I want to concentrate all my energies on various business projects and this involvement becomes increasingly incompatible with Senate duties in Ottawa."
_	Tamagawa showed that the mass formula was equivalent to the statement that the Tamagawa number of
_	This would make him a contemporary of Socrates, and agrees with the statement that Philolaus and Democritus were contemporaries.
_	Station's General Manager Michael Jack said in the statement that "our investigative team is among the most experienced in the industry, and to suggest that the station won’t cover the NYPD fairly, accurately and with balance simply because the commissioner appeared in a station promotional spot is simply not true".
_	The third Moufang identity is therefore equivalent to the statement that the triple formula_13 is an autotopy of formula_10 for all formula_12 in formula_10.
_	For example, in making the statement that 'sodium metal is reactive', we are alluding to the fact that sodium reacts with many common reagents (including pure oxygen, chlorine, hydrochloric acid, water) and/or that it reacts rapidly with such materials at either room temperature or using a Bunsen flame.
_	They issued a common proclamation together that included the statement that: "We look forward to a fruitful collaboration to enable our contemporaries to rediscover the Christian roots of the European Continent which forged the different nations and contributed to developing increasingly harmonious links between them.
_	Roland Greene makes the statement that "the Psalters deserve a central location in our understanding of what sixteenth-century poets did-for they certainly wrote a prodigious volume of psalmic translations-and of what they thought about what they did".
_	The prohibition on Retransfer stems from the requirement for all export authorizations to include the statement that "[t]he technical data or defense service exported from the United States in furtherance of this agreement and any defense article which may be produced or manufactured from such technical data or defense service may not be transferred to a person in a third country or to a national of a third country except as specifically authorized in this agreement unless the prior written approval of the Department of State has been obtained."
_	Further, James noted that response to criticism also relies on faulty logic, an example of which was a response to twin studies with the statement that coincidences in twins are due to astrology, but any differences are due to "heredity and environment", while for other astrologers the issues are too difficult and they just want to get back to their astrology.
_	Brent Forrester asked about seeing their lives on TV, Amelie Gillette asked the question regarding Jim giving up Athlead, Steve Burgess asked if the camera changed the characters' behavior, Steve Hely asked if life has no meaning, Allison Silverman made the statement that Jim is attractive, and Dan Sterling asked what was in the teapot.
_	Fermat's theorem is equivalent to the statement that these are the only points on the curve for which both "x" and "y" are rational.
_	In addition, Decker states that LDS Church leaders have ”covered up thousands of historical and archeological errors,” while contrasting this with the statement that the Bible is “historically and archaeologically” accurate.
_	This work, devoted to the championship of the Maimonidean 13 articles of belief against the attacks of Hasdai Crescas and Joseph Albo, ends with the statement that Maimonides compiled these articles merely in accordance with the fashion of other nations, which set up axioms or fundamental principles for their science.
_	Notice that this includes the statement that formula_10 and hence the assumption that formula_1 is normal.
_	The third law is equivalent to the statement that
_	The Riemann hypothesis is also equivalent to the statement that, for all "n" > 5040,
_	Fermat's theorem on sums of two squares is then equivalent to the statement that a prime formula_70 is represented by the form formula_99 (i.e., formula_100, formula_101) exactly when formula_70 is congruent to formula_79 modulo formula_104.
_	Buchwald declined, however, to issue an injunction against the President and instead issued a declaratory judgment with the statement that "we must assume that the President and Scavino [ Dan Scavino, the White House director of social media] will remedy the blocking we have held to be unconstitutional."
_	The Lieb–Thirring inequality () for formula_52 is equivalent to the statement that
_	For example, when he made the statement that "Israel is salvation, but not redemption," Christian theologians understood his position as one close to their view of "signs of the Kingdom," opening up possibilities of dialogue and understanding.
_	In consonance with the statement that scammony acts only after admixture with the bile, is the fact that hypodermic or intravenous injection of the drug produces no purgation, or indeed any other result.
_	One of the first references to Alphabet Nursery Blocks was made by English philosopher John Locke, in 1693, made the statement that "dice and playthings, with letters on them to teach children the alphabet by playing" would make learning to read a more enjoyable experience.
_	However, this ability to define a burstiness for the output is in direct contradiction to the statement that the leaky bucket (as a queue) necessarily gives an output with a rigid rate, no matter how bursty the input.
_	This is the statement that the speed of the particle much be larger than the phase velocity of electromagnetic fields at frequency formula_11 in order to have Cherenkov radiation.
_	Nagarjuna famously opens his magnum opus, the "Mulamadhyamakakarika", with the statement that the Buddha claimed that true happiness was found through dispelling 'vain thinking' ([[prapañca]], also "conceptual proliferation").
_	According to a Regent Air service brochure, its 727 aircraft were configured to carry just 30 passengers in an all first class cabin with the statement that ""Regent Air is an experience in luxury that has no parallel in travel"".
_	Also self evident is the statement that two plus two is equal to four.
_	This behaviour under CPT symmetry is the same as the statement that the particle and its antiparticle lie in the same irreducible representation of the Poincaré group.
_	A 2015 Eurobarometer survey found that only 29% of Bulgarians agreed with the statement that transgender people should be able to change their civil documents in order to match their inner gender identity.
_	Several Victorian era sources make the statement that his father was called William de la Pole, as do the 17th century historians William Dugdale and William Camden.
_	Nikolai Baev and Nikolai Alekseev sought a retraction of the statement that the parade was "satanic" and demanded 2,000 roubles (around $80) in damages.
_	There is, however, some reason for the statement that this identification is doubtful (comp. "Shebeṭ Yehudah," § 62).
_	The critical language ... is the statement that "[e]volution is a theory, not a fact, concerning the origin of living things."
_	According to a 1995 survey by Lake Research and Tarrance Group, 64% of U.S. Catholics say they disapprove of the statement that "abortion is morally wrong in every case".
_	League conducted a poll in Europe in 2007 that asked respondents if they agreed with the statement that "Jews have too much power in international financial markets".
_	Beginning with the statement that "God's creation is well made", it recounts how a country bumpkin questions intelligent design in the creation by supposing that it would be better if oaks bore pumpkins and feeble vines supported acorns.
_	In correspondence with the statement that media effect is the result of a combination of variables, media effects can also be enhanced or reduced by individual difference and social context diversity.
_	In June 2018, Mogherini issued the statement that EU praised the 2018 North Korea–United States summit between US President Donald Trump and North Korean leader Kim Jong-un.
_	Jee's wife, Choi Kyung-jin, made the statement that the kidnappers Patrick Joseph Banez demanded a ransom of ₱8 million, and she reportedly paid ₱5 million on October 30, 2016.
_	She also agreed with the statement that Shaw was a "habitual liar" and continued "I disapproved of the number of men she had traipsing into her bedroom and suggested she should have a turnstile on her bedroom door".
_	While the biomechanical evidence is not sufficient to support the statement that CMT causes cervical artery dissection (CD), clinical reports suggest that mechanical forces have a part in a substantial number of CDs and the majority of population controlled studies found an association between CMT and VAS in young people.
_	If true, this would be a generalization of the four color theorem, which was shown by Tait to be equivalent to the statement that 3-regular graphs with a polyhedral embedding on a sphere are of class one.
_	This is equivalent to the statement that any Noetherian valuation ring is either a field or a discrete valuation ring.
_	This animosity remained until after Santana Lopes became Prime Minister, with a particular commentary on his performance finishing with the statement that he was "worse than the worst Guterres" and that he was "making Guterres look better and pushing them to Belém", leading to a response from Santana Lopes' Government Speaker Rui Gomes da Silva, who accused him of an "involuntary cabal".
_	Babel’s opinion on either side is very ambiguous, but he does make the statement that what happened after the Bolshevik Revolution may not have been the best thing for Russia."
_	The date of his first degree sufficiently disproves the statement that he was a monk of Ely.
_	Abraham instructs her to tell Ishmael some version of the statement that he is not pleased with or to change "the threshold of his door."
_	Abraham instructs her to tell Ishmael some version of the statement that he is pleased with "the threshold of his door."
_	Thus it became standard to begin any account of holy wells with the statement that the Christian church had adopted them from the pagans and replaced the heathen gods with Christian saints, in order to win people over to the new religion more smoothly.
_	Upon breaching the barriers and entering the base, the women were making the statement that they would not stay at home and do nothing, as women are traditionally expected to do while the men take care of the serious "male" issues.
_	According to Everett the statement that Pirahã is a finite language without embedding and without recursion presents a challenge for proposals by Noam Chomsky and others concerning universal grammar—on the grounds that if these proposals are correct, all languages should show evidence of recursive (and similar) grammatical structures.
_	Let us prove the statement that
_	In the "warning label" the Council caused to have placed on copies of Mangin's map was the statement that expansion of the city, such as shown on the map, was "subject to such future arrangements as the Corporation may deem best calculated to promote the health, introduce regularity, and conduce to the convenience of the City."
_	On January 17, 2014, Copernicus Publications announced that they were terminating the journal, citing both the statement that questioned the IPCC's prediction of continued global warming and the "nepotistic" appointing of similarly-minded scientists to the journal's editorial board.
_	However, the re-creations did not involve overt escape, merely a replication of tricks with the statement that they were accomplished by secret magicians' skills rather than spirits.
_	Another important development was the statement that democratic principles would be the basis of the new state's governance, something that was declared by the Vilnius Conference, but omitted in the Act of 11 December.
_	The design of the vehicle was revealed to the press in January 2008, with the statement that the vehicle itself was around 60% complete.
_	The overall policy for religious symbols in air force chapels is summed up in the statement that "Because of their multi-faith use, these facilities must be religiously neutral in design, as well as flexible in their programming.
_	The guidelines include the statement that anyone making inappropriate edits will be disciplined.
_	Not all respondents agreed with the statement that religion does more harm to the same degree.
_	China condemned the US monetary policy of quantitative easing, responding to S&P's downgrade of U.S. credit rating, and advised the United States not to continue with the accumulation of debt, concluding with the statement that America cannot continue to borrow to solve financial problems.
_	Hence we do not find in him any hint as to the connection between the moral law and God, beyond the statement that God must reward virtue and punish vice.
_	The Book 1 is introduced with the statement that wise and sincere friends may be poor or destitute, but it is they who may help one achieve successes in life.
_	Perhaps his commitment to design excellence and communicating with the map reader can be distilled down into the statement that “Borden Dent made maps that told a story.
_	May wrote at National Review Online shortly afterward that Greenwald had "[p]redictably" and "dishonorably" misrepresented the statement that he had e-mailed to Greenwald, which he said had criticized specious Nazi comparisons by both Limbaugh, Moveon.org, and Nancy Pelosi.
_	Someone experienced in calculus, for example, would consider the statement that
_	This is clarified by the statement that God can communicate with people in many ways (the next song you hear, the next sunset you experience, the next time you hear laughter, the next movie that really moves you), and not necessarily through words 'spoken' by God to a person.
_	Paul II referred to Paul VI's "Credo of the People of God" as a reaffirmation of the statement that Mary is the "mother of the entire Christian people, both faithful and pastors" and wrote that the Credo "restated this truth in an even more forceful way":
_	Similarly the statement that observers are led to different pictures of the universe has been understood as an argument that different conceptualizations are incommensurable making translation between different conceptual and linguistic systems impossible.
_	The telegram contained the statement that the Provisional Government would continue the war with the Tsarist war aims.
_	"A" is the first virial coefficient, which has a constant value of 1 and makes the statement that when volume is large, all fluids behave like ideal gases.
_	An African-American minister came and preached a series of sermons in the church and it is said by those who attended that each sermon was centered around the city of Joppa, and he made the statement that "Joppa was a sabbath day's journey from Jerusalem."
_	For example, only 13 percent of the journalists agreed that large private corporations should be nationalized, while 86 percent endorsed the statement that "people with more ability should earn higher salaries."
_	Ethan Bronner, in the "New York Times", found the book a largely persuasive defence of Israel's positions morally and politically, but disputed the statement that there is no "cycle of violence", and that there is only one-sided aggression since Israel simply fights back against "Palestinian terrorists".
_	This opinion is supported by the statement that Job with Jethro and Balaam was consulted by Pharaoh as to the means of reducing the number of the children of Israel and that Job was stricken with calamity because he had remained silent.
_	It was revealed by The Scotsman that Inglis was one of the 33 signatories that agreed the statement that the resolution to admit lady members 'should not be approved at this time'.
_	That was the statement that I can rap and I can do every style of rap."
_	It was noted that "the statement that Marinko had not been reported before during his long football career was taken into consideration" by the tribunal.
_	Bale and Pits quote Leland's 'Collectanea' for the statement that he flourished in 1274, but the printed copies of Leland do not contain the passage; the name appears in a list of the monks of the priory of Canterbury under the year 1294.
_	Aristotle made the statement that "the citizens must not live a mechanic or a mercantile life (for such a life is ignoble and inimical to virtue), nor yet must those who are to be citizens in the best state be tillers of the soil (for leisure is needed both for the development of virtue and for active participation in politics)", often paraphrased as "all paid jobs absorb and degrade the mind".
_	According to the 2004 General Social Survey, approximately 71 percent of American adults agreed with the statement that children sometimes need a "good, hard spanking", down from 84 percent in 1986.
_	Despite popular opinion that "freeway" means a road with at least two carriageways, single carriageway freeways exist, as is evidenced by the statement that "the roads include 1400 km of dual carriageway freeway, 440 km of single carriageway freeway and 5300 km of single carriage main road with unlimited access."
_	the names of implied-DO variables have a scope of the statement that contains
_	Modern scholarship casts doubt on the statement that Jan Mostaert was a relative of Gillis.
_	Second, the condition that Taiwan accept any form of the one China principle is not explicitly mentioned in the text, and the statement that talks can occur in different modalities and in differing stages suggests that Beijing is willing to start at least informal talks without requiring a one China commitment.
_	Major C. F. Westell, a ballistics authority, said, "I can certainly describe as sheer nonsense the statement that cartridges of machine guns or pistols detonated in a fire can penetrate a human body."
_	"With respect to the way in which the salvific grace of God — which is always given by means of Christ in the Spirit and has a mysterious relationship to the Church — comes to individual non-Christians, the Second Vatican Council limited itself to the statement that God bestows it "in ways known to himself"." (VI, 21)
_	The charge concludes with the statement that the traffic is being carried on with the indifference if not the closed-eye compliance of some American officials, and there is no likelihood of its being shut down in the foreseeable future.
_	Some have objected to the statement that the poor will always exist, although Jesus also says you can help them any time you want.
_	He was a successful warrior who is defined by the statement that his heroism remains unchallenged even after hundreds of battles with the Murundas and Kushans.
_	By electing a territorial delegate, they were making the statement that no legal state of Louisiana existed while it was occupied by the Union Army, and Congress should remand it to the status of a territory.
_	The vertices of odd degree in a graph are sometimes called odd nodes or odd vertices; in this terminology, the handshaking lemma can be restated as the statement that every graph has an even number of odd nodes.
_	Among his disagreements with the majority was the statement that incorporation was not at issue in this case.
_	That year, the "Nevada State Journal" wrote: "Even today residents of Ely can startle visitors with the statement that 'Tex Rickard built the Northern'."
_	The same idea is expressed in the statement that after Solon's time courtesans were put under the protection of Aphrodite Pandemos.
_	Her brother, Enrique Rubio, corrected the statement that she was supposedly expecting twins, which was not true.
_	The envoys were however denied with the statement that only those living in a Muslim territory who paid the "jizya" could be permitted to restore a temple.
_	The manifesto also contains the statement that 'We recognize private property, private investment and the market economy.'.
_	According to Herodian he had governed provinces, but the list of seven provinces given in the "Historia Augusta", as well as the statement that Balbinus had been both Proconsul of Asia and of Africa, are likely to be mere invention.
_	The lawsuit was dismissed by a federal magistrate, who ruled that the store's signage "amounted to permissible 'puffery'" and that "the statement that 'no cages' were used to raise broiler chickens was not misleading merely because Whole Foods failed to also disclose that poultry suppliers normally do not use cages in the first place."
_	If "P"("B") is not zero, then this is equivalent to the statement that
_	More generally, he considered the statement that a theory be invariant under a group "G" to be expressed in terms of the invariance of the transition probability between any two rays.
_	Poundland backed down from the ban on 31 October 2011, and released the statement that employees will be allowed to "use their own discretion in wearing poppies" after hundreds of customers threatened to boycott the store.
_	In Ch XIV, "Metageometrical Space in the Light of Modern Analysis Riemann's Essay," Stallo flamingly critiques Riemann's "On the Hypotheses which lie at the Base of Geometry," ending with the statement that "the analytical argument in favor of the existence, or possibility, of transcendental space is another flagrant instance of the reification of concepts."
_	An anti-Conservative Party advertisement for the CDA was published in "Right Now!", containing the statement that the CDA was "horrified by Tory frontbench spokesmen advocating gay lifestyles and New Labour ideas".
_	Speculating on the reasons for the construction of such an elaborate and expensive building, one author makes the statement that: "The reaction to the communes of Paris and Lyon were triumphalist monuments, the Sacré-Coeur of Montmartre and the basilica of Fourvière, dominating both cities.
_	Halicarnassus was founded by Dorian Greeks, and the figures on its coins, such as the head of Medusa, Athena or Poseidon, or the trident, support the statement that the mother cities were Troezen and Argos.
_	None of his class will demur to the statement that Clay was the leader of us all.
_	A cross-European survey published in 2011 found that 48% of UK citizens agreed with the statement that Islam was "a religion of intolerance".
_	"The story of the contest may be summed up in the statement that the Lexington boys were outclassed."
_	Paul II referred to Paul VI's "Credo of the People of God" as a reaffirmation of the statement that Mary is the "mother of the entire Christian people, both faithful and pastors" and wrote that the Credo "restated this truth in an even more forceful way":
_	In mathematics, Cramer's paradox or the Cramer–Euler paradox is the statement that the number of points of intersection of two higher-order curves in the plane can be greater than the number of arbitrary points that are usually needed to define one such curve.
_	The axiom of choice is equivalent to the statement that every set can be well-ordered, i.e. that every cardinal has an initial ordinal.
_	Late 13th and 14th century sources suggest that Boniface based his claim to Thessalonica on the statement that his younger brother Renier had been granted Thessalonica on his marriage to Maria Komnene in 1180.
_	Quintus Curtius Rufus, Philotas's trial and the statement that the Greek-speaking Branchidae had common language with the Macedonians.
_	Samuel was the father-in-law of Hai ben Sherira Gaon, who is authority for the statement that Samuel, like many of his contemporaries, zealously pursued the study of non-Jewish literature.
_	This inequality is equivalent to the statement that "x" = "x" ∧ ("y" ∨ "z"), and by the distributive law "x" = ("x" ∧ "y") ∨ ("x" ∧ "z").
_	It is therefore possible for one to make the statement that an artist ‘has "ḥāl"’, ‘plays with "ḥāl"’, or even that he is ‘experiencing his own "ḥāl".’
_	Lobachevsky replaced Playfair's axiom with the statement that for any given point there exists "more than" one line that can be extended through that point and run parallel to another line of which that point is not part.
_	In 2016, he authored a letter signed by 60 fellow African-American politicians urging the Democratic Platform Committee to keep the same language, refusing to include the statement that Israel is engaging in an "occupation" of Palestine that appeared in previous Democratic platforms.
_	He has also argued the likelihood that Eusebius got from Hegesippus the statement that St. John was exiled to Patmos by Domitian.
_	65% of Nigerians, 61% of Indonesians, and 58% of Indians agree with the statement that "Facebook is the Internet".
_	The trial was public, but the statement that Nathuram Godse gave during the trial on why he killed Gandhi was immediately banned by the Indian government.
_	An example is in the very first verse of the Book of Genesis, the statement that God created is marked with an Etnachta, showing the completion of God’s creation.
_	The quadratic reciprocity law is the statement that certain patterns found in the table are true in general.
_	Believing when he made the statement that a "walker" was involved, Phil O'Brien of the Rescue Team stated "I urge walkers not to take any unnecessary risks and where possible, to use appropriate maps."
_	The equivalence lies in the statement that for any external voltages (formula_14 and formula_15) applying at the three nodes (formula_16 and formula_17), the corresponding currents (formula_18 and formula_19) are exactly the same for both the Y and Δ circuit, and vice versa.
_	As Kravtsov’s defending attorney, Ivan Pavlov stated that the defense never denied the mere fact of resume submission but argued against the statement that the resume had contained any information comprising state secret.
_	The sociolinguist Peter Trudgill has linked Kloss's theoretical framework with Einar Haugen's framework of autonomy and heteronomy, with the statement that a variety is an "ausbau" language corresponding to the statement that it is used "autonomously" with respect to other related languages.
_	If "P"("N") stands for the proposition that there is an infinitude of pairs of prime numbers (not necessarily consecutive primes) that differ by exactly "N", then Zhang's result is equivalent to the statement that there exists at least one even integer "k" < 70,000,000 such that "P"("k") is true.
_	The four color theorem (proved by ) on vertex coloring of planar graphs, is equivalent to the statement that every bridgeless 3-regular planar graph is of class one .
_	The outer bulkhead was plated over with railroad iron like that on the bow, 1 inch (25 millimeters) thick (a source needs to be cited to support the statement that the outer bulkhead was plated over with railroad iron).
_	In a survey of doctors conducted under the auspices of the Jewish Theological Seminary, 83 percent of Jewish doctors agreed with the statement that intelligent design is "a religiously inspired pseudo-science" rather than a "legitimate scientific speculation"
_	"The successful modeling of the properties and structures of silica ... lends credence to the statement that a silica polymorph like quartz can be viewed as a giant molecule bound together by essentially the same forces that bind the atoms of the Si-O-Si skeleton into a small siloxane molecule".
_	Buchanan also included the statement that Wood was slain by "fechtit men out of Teviotdale."
_	The Biblical account of Deborah ends with the statement that after the battle, there was peace in the land for 40 years ().
_	A drawing method found by Kazimierz Zarankiewicz has been conjectured to give the correct answer for every complete bipartite graph, and the statement that this is true has come to be known as the Zarankiewicz crossing number conjecture.
_	65% of Nigerians, and 61% of Indonesians agree with the statement that "Facebook is the Internet" compared with only 5% in the US.
_	Callahan also says in the statement that without proper documentation of the techniques and processes there is no real experiment.
_	Galvin's proof generalizes to the statement that, for every bipartite multigraph, the list chromatic index equals its chromatic index.
_	Turney had in early 1873 published a booklet "Diabolism" which included the statement that "sin was an element of the flesh of the Son of God" but during the Spring of 1873 came to renounce this view and came to support and promote Handley's view in his magazine, then on Thursday 28 August 1873 as guest lecturer for the Birmingham Ecclesia, which met at Temperance Hall, Temple Street, Birmingham, forcefully taught these views at the large influential Birmingham Ecclesia.
_	The World Health Organization ICD-10 criteria are almost identical to DSM-IV: ICD-10 adds the statement that motor clumsiness is usual (although not necessarily a diagnostic feature); ICD-10 adds the statement that isolated special skills, often related to abnormal preoccupations, are common but are not required for diagnosis; and the DSM-IV requirement for clinically significant impairment in social, occupational, or other important areas of functioning is not included in ICD-10.
_	Thus, for example, , which is just the statement that and are the only two ways of pairing three elements of a magma with two operations.
_	An equivalent calculation in the case that the variables "a", "b", "c", and "d" are rational numbers shows the identity may be interpreted as the statement that the norm in the field Q("i") is multiplicative: the norm is given by
_	The Supreme Court's 1873 "Slaughterhouse Cases" decision contained the statement that "The phrase, 'subject to its jurisdiction,' was intended to exclude from its operation children of ministers, consuls, and citizens or subjects of foreign states born within the United States."
_	On March 12, 2018, over 40 economists polled by the University of Chicago's IGM Forum unanimously either disagreed or strongly disagreed with the statement that: "Imposing new US tariffs on steel and aluminum will improve Americans’ welfare."
_	The document began with the statement that "the United States and all other countries respect the independence, sovereignty, unity, and territorial integrity of Vietnam as recognized by the 1954 Geneva Agreements on Vietnam".
_	After this particular conversation on seeing time, Billy makes the statement that this philosophy does not seem to evoke any sense of free will.
_	Mirsky's theorem can be restated in terms of directed acyclic graphs (representing a partially ordered set by reachability of their vertices), as the statement that there exists a graph homomorphism from a given directed acyclic graph "G" to a "k"-vertex transitive tournament if and only if there does not exist a homomorphism from a ("k" + 1)-vertex path graph to "G".
_	The interim report also aroused particular interest for the statement that gay people have "gifts and qualities to offer the Christian community."
_	His farewell-song contains the statement that a conquering power never will win over a small country, mostly because the country always will live in the stories and the songs.
_	As a result of the consistent exponential growth rate and immediacy of science, the statement that the majority of scientists throughout history are alive at any given moment must be consistent throughout history as well, meaning that in 1700 the majority of all scientists ever were alive, true also for 1800 and 1900 and so on.
_	This multiple meaning can lead to confusion; for example, the statement that a person "passed matric" or "has their matric" may mean either that they received a Senior Certificate (i.e. they finished high school) or specifically that they received a Senior Certificate with Matriculation Endorsement (i.e. they are eligible to enter university).
_	Frist rejected an early version of the statement as too weak, and gave his approval to the statement that Specter eventually delivered.
_	This is sometimes supported by the statement that the whiskers of individual cats extend out to about the same width as the cat's body, but at least two informal reports indicate that whisker length is genetically determined and does not vary as the cat grows thinner or fatter.
_	Great unrest answered Grävell's words, as the National Assembly was directly confronted with the statement that the Regent's power originated from the states, "not" the revolution.
_	Mach's principle is sometimes interpreted as the statement that such a particle's state of motion has no meaning in that case.
_	From the start, SPC's role was constrained, and the invitation from Australia and New Zealand to the US, France, Netherlands and the UK to participate in a South Seas Commission Conference in 1947 included the statement that ""the [South Pacific] Commission to be set up should not be empowered to deal in any way with political matters or questions of defense or security""
_	During excavations, a copper plate was found, which contained the text of the "Nidana-Sutra" which concluded the statement that plate had been deposited in the Nirvana-Chaitya by one Haribala, who also installed the great Nirvana Statue of Buddha in the temple front.
_	Any statement of pure identity theory is equivalent to either σ("N") or to ¬σ("N") for some finite subset "N" of the non-negative integers, where σ("N") is the statement that the number of elements is in "N".
_	used this fact in their proof of the case "k" = 6 of the Hadwiger conjecture, the statement that every 6-chromatic graph has the complete graph "K" as a minor: they showed that any minimal counterexample to the conjecture would have to be an apex graph, but since there are no 6-chromatic apex graphs such a counterexample cannot exist.
_	For example, on this account, to "know" that the kettle is boiling is not to be in a particular state of mind, but to perform a particular task with the statement that the kettle is boiling.
_	Since the fundamental theorem of algebra can be seen as the statement that the field of complex numbers is algebraically closed, it follows that any theorem concerning algebraically closed fields applies to the field of complex numbers.
_	A related bound was given by Jeffrey Lagarias in 2002, who proved that the Riemann hypothesis is equivalent to the statement that
_	Nevertheless, he argued that the WHO, "in cooperation with some big pharmaceutical companies and their scientists, re-defined pandemics", removing the statement that "an enormous amount of people have contracted the illness or died" from its existing definition and replacing it by stating simply that there has to be a virus, spreading beyond borders and to which people have no immunity.
_	Stewart responded with the statement that the bureau was following protocol regarding the release of information during an election campaign and that the same bureau also withheld a report showing positive job growth during the month of April 2009, a month prior to the election.
_	It is straightforward to see that this is equivalent to the other definition: the Archimedean property for a pair of elements "a" and "b" is just the statement that the cyclic subgroup generated by "a" is not bounded by "b".
_	These individuals also agree with the statement that the sensations and behaviors of anxiety are harmful or dangerous.
_	They wear these specific uniforms because they are worn by Russian police during clashes between police and protesters for change, and to make the statement that illegal violence not only kills the oppressed, but slowly kills the oppressors.
_	Sheehan made the statement that the United States should consider annexation of Canada during the start of the Cold War, which received notoriety in the USSR propaganda entitled "Yankees in Canada", which portrayed America as expansionist.
_	The example Volokh uses is the statement that "Joe deserves to die" which in the "context" of a murder could be made to be a factual statement.
_	In 2008, he labeled the Russia–Georgia War as a "Georgian attack" on "Russian peacekeepers" and ended his article with the statement that Finland should not discuss NATO membership because "it could create the impression that Finland is moving from cooperation to confrontation".
_	The conjecture, which for general "K" is still open , then comes out as the statement that "R" is not zero.
_	It was also stated in the statement that the Board of Directors of IntraPower recommended the shareholders of the company approve the transaction.
_	The most interesting point of his analysis is the statement that information being “planted” into our heads is responsible for forming our judg(e)ments and beliefs, which in turn determine our actions, and our life as a whole.
_	We make the statement that incorrectly guessed keys will generate LFSR output which agrees with the generator output roughly 50% of the time, because given two random bit sequences of a given length, the probability of agreement between the sequences at any particular bit is 0.5.
_	She noted bigger fonts, large amounts of white space, and she welcomed changes to various functionalities, concluding with the statement that "Apple Music’s redesign is a huge improvement over its previous incarnation, and a clear sign that Apple is listening to its customers".
_	The 1776 Declaration of Independence included the statement that "all men are created equal," which has ultimately inspired actions and legislation against slavery and racial discrimination.
_	In mathematical programming and polyhedral combinatorics, the Hirsch conjecture is the statement that the edge-vertex graph of an "n"-facet polytope in "d"-dimensional Euclidean space has diameter no more than "n" − "d".
_	then the Ádem relations are equivalent to the statement that
_	Thus, the Stein–Strömberg theorem is the statement that the Hardy–Littlewood maximal operator is of strong type ("p", "p") uniformly with respect to the dimension "n".
_	In the philosophy of mathematics, he became known for the statement that "Mathematics is the science that draws necessary conclusions".
_	Given this result, Fermat's Last Theorem is reduced to the statement that two groups have the same order.
_	This is equivalent to the statement that the photon has odd intrinsic parity.
_	Consider the statement that formula_3 converges to some operator formula_6 on formula_2.
_	Superabundant numbers are also of interest in connection with the Riemann hypothesis, and with Robin's theorem that the Riemann hypothesis is equivalent to the statement that
_	The Roman road (Via Julia) very possibly passed through the village, although the statement that there was once a Roman milestone at the junction of Old Road and Albion Road Approach is erroneous (the milestone in question is actually from Pyle).
_	The existence of kernels and images is part of the statement that the category of vector spaces (over a fixed field "F") is an abelian category, i.e. a corpus of mathematical objects and structure-preserving maps between them (a category) that behaves much like the category of abelian groups.
_	Consider the statement that "every natural number greater than 1 is a product of (one or more) prime numbers", which is the "existence" part of the fundamental theorem of arithmetic.
_	Bart D. Ehrman, a New Testament scholar and historian of early Christianity, contends that the number seven may be merely symbolic, since, in Jewish tradition, seven was the number of completion, so the statement that Mary was possessed by seven demons may simply mean she was completely overwhelmed by their power.
_	In the book "Plain Speaking" by the writer Merle Miller, based on interviews with President Truman, Miller attributes to Truman the statement that appointing Clark to the Court was his "biggest mistake" as President, adding, "He was no damn good as Attorney General, and on the Supreme Court . . . it doesn't seem possible, but he's been even worse."
_	It ends with the statement that "I'll never do another of these readings", but in fact, he did one more in California in March 1980 – see the film "The Last Straw".
_	This is equivalent to the statement that the game induced by formula_19 has a value.
_	Thus the fixed point lemma is equivalent to the statement that the fixed points of a normal function form a closed and unbounded class.
_	The death of God, in particular the statement that "we killed him", is similar to the "self"-dissolution of Christian doctrine: due to the advances of the sciences, which for Nietzsche show that man is the product of evolution, that Earth has no special place among the stars and that history is not progressive, the Christian notion of God can no longer serve as a basis for a morality.
_	The book concludes with the statement that only some universes of the multiple universes (or multiverse) support life forms and that we are located in one of those universes.
_	The concept, due to Ronald Fisher, is equivalent to the statement that, conditional on the value of a sufficient statistic for a parameter, the joint probability distribution of the data does not depend on that parameter.
_	Thomas's earlier writings had frequently referenced the legal theory of natural law; during his confirmation hearings Thomas limited himself to the statement that he regards natural law as a "philosophical background" to the Constitution.
_	They objected strongly to the proposal for the union of England and Scotland, and were suspected of abetting a rising which took place in the west of Scotland in 1706; but there appears to be no foundation for the statement that they intrigued with the Jacobites, and they gave no trouble to the government either in 1715 or in 1745.
_	Wadge determinacy is the statement that for all pairs A,B of subsets of Baire space, the Wadge game G(A,B) is determined.
_	Similarly for a pointclass Γ, Γ Wadge determinacy is the statement that for all sets A,B in Γ, the Wadge game G(A,B) is determined.
_	Testimony on page 76 In a recently filed document in the Federal District Court for western North Carolina The Harleysville Mutual Insurance Company makes the statement that it believes that the arson was set by The Hammocks LLC's "Authorized agents"
_	Spratt turned down the offer, gave the statement that he felt he was not ready to fight reigning champion Matt Hughes, and was subsequently released from the promotion.
_	65% of Nigerians, and 61% of Indonesians agree with the statement that "Facebook is the Internet" compared with only 5% in the United States.
_	By projective duality, Möbius' result is equivalent to the statement that, if seven of the eight face planes of two tetrahedra contain the corresponding vertices of the other tetrahedron, then the eighth face plane also contains the same vertex.
_	is equivalent to the statement that—in a coordinate basis—the Christoffel symbol is symmetric in the lower two indices:
_	The axiom of determinacy is the statement that all such games are determined.
_	This is equivalent, by definition, to the statement that each infinite subtree of the binary tree formula_1 has an infinite path of low degree.
_	He concludes with the statement that he intends his book only to purify and ennoble the hearts of his readers.
_	For instance, the University of Chicago and University of Michigan uses the term "Financial Resources Statement" for the statement that students need to submit to it regarding how they will meet their expenses., while the University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign uses the term "Declaration & Certification of Finances for I-20/DS-2019 Application".
_	The Tanya’s concept of two souls, and the statement that the souls of the Gentile nations of the world are different from those of Jewish souls (emanating instead from the realm of evil), have been controversial.
_	They said in the statement that they are parting ways due to "irreconcilable professional differences".
_	Explicitly, the tensor algebra satisfies the following universal property, which formally expresses the statement that it is the most general algebra containing "V":
_	Farah concluded with the statement that there were "plenty more things to be offended about in this video" such as "the dead animals, tied up baby dolls, the Bible on fire and Nicki Minaj, Kanye West, and other pop stars painted as the Satanic heads of some sort of Hydra monster."
_	Shortly after the initial news spreading, Zuffa quickly responded following the first class action with the statement that, "The UFC will vigorously defend itself and its business practices."
_	He also supports “A Course in Miracles”, which is a foundation for inner peace and is method of coping with fear by shifting your perspective from fear to love, parting from the statement that “fear is an illusion that we create”.
_	The Smale conjecture, named after Stephen Smale is the statement that the diffeomorphism group of the 3-sphere has the homotopy-type of its isometry group, the orthogonal group O(4).
_	Following the adoption of the amended version of H.B. 444, Senator Les Ihara, Jr. stated, "I have a hard time reconciling the statement that the proponents made, that this is for equal rights and civil unions—at the same time, this kills it for the session."
_	For instance, the University of Chicago and University of Michigan uses the term "Financial Resources Statement" for the statement that students need to submit to it regarding how they will meet their expenses, while the University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign uses the term "Declaration & Certification of Finances for I-20/DS-2019 Application".
_	The exceptions to the statement that only nouns denoting human beings and dogs have distinct plurals are all nouns derived from verbs.
_	When the respondents were asked to give their opinion on a number of statements about gender roles 63% of the respondents agreed with the statement that "Boys’ education is more important than girls’"; 37% disagreed with it.
_	The "Target" ad cleverly superimposes a smaller Eye inside the larger one, creating a bull's-eye effect to tie into the statement that CBS had hit its target.
_	The generalized version of the conjecture is equivalent to the statement that the number of unexpandable fractions is not just sublinear but bounded.
_	In mathematics — specifically, in differential topology — Berger's inequality for Einstein manifolds is the statement that any 4-dimensional Einstein manifold ("M", "g") has non-negative Euler characteristic "χ"("M") ≥ 0. The inequality is named after the French mathematician Marcel Berger.
_	MEF commander Major General Richard Zilmer responded to press queries about the statement that Anbar Province was lost.
_	One definition is the Open Definition which can be summarized in the statement that "A piece of data is open if anyone is free to use, reuse, and redistribute it – subject only, at most, to the requirement to attribute and/or share-alike."
_	A 2015 study found that 65% of Nigerians, 61% of Indonesians, and 58% of Indians agree with the statement that "Facebook is the Internet" compared with only 5% in the US.
_	The characteristic property of the initial topology is equivalent to the statement that there exists a universal morphism from the forgetful functor
_	In the above equation, formula_1 usually represents a proposition (such as the statement that a coin lands on heads fifty percent of the time) and formula_2 represents the evidence, or new data that is to be taken into account (such as the result of a series of coin flips).
_	Galvin and Komjáth showed that the axiom of choice is equivalent to the statement that every graph has a chromatic number.
_	Peter Gustav Lejeune Dirichlet's criterion on irrationality to the statement that a real number α is irrational if and only if there are infinitely many rational numbers "p"/"q", written in lowest terms, such that
_	On the fourth day of the trial, the Solicitor-General accepted the statement that George Archer-Shee did not cash the postal order "and consequently that he is innocent of the charge.
_	In 1931 an international court in The Hague issued the statement that the Polish seizure of the city had been a violation of international law, but without any political aftermath.
_	By September Donald Bradman made the statement that " the South African cricketers would not come until they stopped racially selecting the team" and officially withdrew their cricket invitation.
_	There is similar difference of opinion as regards the statement that Archelaus formulated certain ethical doctrines.
_	In her televised interview with ABC News anchor Charlie Gibson on September 12, 2008, she made the statement that as a politician she felt that her opinions were to be made openly to the public, but that sometimes it may differ with political legislation.
_	General Grant made the statement that the Centennial Commission was not responsible for state laws.
_	Hilbert's Nullstellensatz of algebraic geometry is a special case of the statement that the polynomial ring in finitely many variables over a field is a Hilbert ring.
_	This stance was further justified with the statement that "democratic systems are all supported on a basis of coercion sanctioned by the use of force", and "the ruling class are never more dangerous than when they are doing impressions of human beings".
_	This release was claimed by some to contradict the statement that Bush made on February 8, 2004 to "Meet the Press" interviewer Tim Russert, that "We did [authorize the release of everything] in 2000, by the way."
_	The possible appropriation of Constantine VI's identity is linked in some Byzantine sources with the statement that Thomas was a rumoured supporter of iconolatry, as opposed to Michael's support for iconoclasm: it was under Constantine VI that veneration of the icons was restored.
_	Samkange cites this biography in his 1968 book "Origins of Rhodesia" to support the statement that Helm was "a mere mercenary, a paid hack of Rhodes".
_	The movie ends with the statement that Gaines and Comer led Permian to an undefeated state championship season the following year.
_	Dick sums it up with the statement that "...it is better to remain alone and suffer only the misery of being alone, so long as it is possible to find distraction in daily work.
_	This may be expressed by the statement that there is only one kind of temperature, regardless of the variety of scales in which it is expressed.
_	The characterisation () of a trace φ on positive operators of a two-ideal "J" as a symmetric functional applied to singular values can be improved to the statement that the trace φ on any operator in "J" is given by the same symmetric functional applied to eigenvalue sequences, provided that the eigenvalues of all operators in "J" belong to the Calkin sequence space "j".
_	The Bharatiya Jnanpith mentioned in the statement that 'the language used by Sobti in her writings is influenced by the intermingling of Hindi, Urdu and Punjabi cultures where her characters are always bold and daring – ready to accept all challenges thrown by the society'.
_	This statement was written down and published as a bull, and the bull contained the statement that the matter would be referred by the Pope to the forthcoming Council.
_	Implicit in that is the statement that a morphism of sheaves is nothing more than a natural transformation of the sheaves, considered as functors.
_	In September 2013, a federal appeals court ruled that "likes" are a form of protected speech under the amendment, commenting that "On the most basic level, clicking on the 'like' button literally causes to be published the statement that the User 'likes' something, which is itself a substantive statement.
_	He stuck to UN Resolution 242, including the statement that territories cannot be acquired by force.
_	This is stronger than the statement that any integral element satisfies some monic polynomial.
_	It does not identify coffee by name, but includes the statement that "hot drinks are not for the belly," which has been interpreted to forbid both coffee and tea.
_	He also said, "I desire no other epitaph … than the statement that I taught medical students in the wards, as I regard this as by far the most useful and important work I have been called upon to do."
_	In particular, for three points in the plane ("n" = 2), the above matrix is square and the points are collinear if and only if its determinant is zero; since that 3 × 3 determinant is plus or minus twice the area of a triangle with those three points as vertices, this is equivalent to the statement that the three points are collinear if and only if the triangle with those points as vertices has zero area.
_	However, if there was no confirmation, tortures could not be repeated, but it was allowed to continue them at the specified day: "But, if the prisoner will not confess the truth satisfactorily, other sorts of tortures must be placed before him, with the statement that unless he will confess the truth, he must endure these also.
_	They got to have some strength and conviction in the statement that "Firepower" certainly does."
_	The Committee of enquiry submitted a lengthy report, which included the statement that there had been
_	The Two Whatevers () refers to the statement that ""We will resolutely uphold whatever policy decisions Chairman Mao made, and unswervingly follow whatever instructions Chairman Mao gave"" (凡是毛主席作出的决策，我们都坚决维护；凡是毛主席的指示，我们都始终不渝地遵循).
_	Her entry in Henry Gardiner Adams’s "A Cyclopaedia of Female Biography" (1857) is identical down to the spelling, save for the statement that ‘[t]o this woman must be given a place in history, beside the heroine of Saragossa, and other examples of female intrepidity’, while the description of Battistati in Ellen Creathorne Clayton’s "Female Warriors : Memorials of Female Valour and Heroism, from the Mythological Ages to the Present Era" (1879) is a paraphrase of Hale’s text.
_	Monsky's theorem, the statement that a square cannot be divided into an odd number of equal-area triangles, is named after Monsky, who published the first proof of it in 1970.
_	However, the Novikov self-consistency principle is intended to go beyond just the statement that history must be consistent, making the additional nontrivial assumption that the universe obeys the same local laws of physics in situations involving time travel that it does in regions of space-time that lack closed timelike curves.
_	Uhler reiterated the statement that he had made in his last report to the Department of Commerce and Labor, where he called attention to the fact that there were only a few gasoline launches large enough to be subject to inspections (only 209 in the last fiscal year) and compared to a tremendous number of vessels just under the inspection threshold.
_	The letter concludes with the statement that Mr. Russell is going to disclose this information in order to free his conscience, and adds that he warned the person responsible of his intentions.
_	One section of the preamble criticized by some historians as well as by the head of Hungary's Jewish community is the statement that the country lost its independence when it was invaded and occupied by Nazi Germany in March 1944.
_	Huan Xuan was so struck by the statement that he fell prostrate on the ground, fearing that Sima Daozi would kill him, and from this point he bore a grudge against the prince.
_	Bradman scored a lifetime average far in excess of average - 4.4 standard deviations above the mean, compared to Jordan's inferior 3.4 - leading to the statement that "no other athlete dominates an international sport to the extent that Bradman does cricket".
_	An important theorem of Emil Artin states that for a finite extension "E"/"F", each of the following statements is equivalent to the statement that "E"/"F" is Galois:
_	Theorem is the statement that an "m" by "n" rectangle can be packed with 1-by-"x" rectangles if and only if "x" divides one of "m" and "n".
_	The proof can be given by induction after "n", with the statement that "f" is cellular on the skeleton "X".
_	She repeated the statement that Abramoff had directed his clients to donate to both parties, but this time referred to her original assertion as a mistake and agreed that the Abramoff scandal is "not a bipartisan scandal; it's a Republican scandal."
_	In the case of right triangles, the triangle inequality specializes to the statement that the hypotenuse is greater than either of the two sides, and less than their sum.
_	In 1927, his proclamation included the statement that, "Christmas is not a time or a season, but a state of mind".
_	Although the e-mail itself is correct except for the statement that "it may be as long as 60,000 years before it happens again" (in fact, Mars will definitely come closer in 2287), the hoax stemmed from a misinterpretation of the sentence "At a modest 75-power magnification Mars will look as large as the full moon to the naked eye".
_	One Gregory answers with a speech (chapters 3-17) which ends with the statement that a copy of the Glory of God was made by Moses and kept in the Ark of the Covenant.
_	The second law of thermodynamics as stated by Carathéodory essentially amounts to the statement that heat is a holonomic process function since the integrating factor formula_11 (where T is temperature) will yield the exact differential of an entropy state function formula_12.
_	He did not visit the most promising oil propspect, Jebel Dukhan, and his prediction of finding oil was generally pessimistic, although he qualified this with the statement that "if…
_	Ashby made the statement that the Civil War really began with John Brown's insurrection.
_	She made the statement that the Soviet socialist system may not respect human rights and, accordingly, was not in compliance with the provisions of the Helsinki accords (human article).
_	Putnam famously summarized this conclusion with the statement that meanings' just ain't in the head."
_	He began his book with the statement that too many people have accepted uncritically what he called the "Nuremberg Thesis", that the Second World War was the result of criminal conspiracy by a small gang comprising Hitler and his associates.
_	This may be expressed also by the statement that is invariant with respect to the length of ; that is to say, provided the optical devices have adequate resolution, and that the transmitting medium is perfectly transparent, as for example a vacuum, then the specific intensity of the source is unaffected by the length of the ray .
_	The examination under electronic microscope support the statement that the fusosomes enable the free passage of cytoplasmatic compounds and/or cell organelles, including the mitochondria.
_	The "fundamental theorem of calculus" is the statement that differentiation and integration are inverse operations: if a continuous function is first integrated and then differentiated, the original function is retrieved.
_	We are allowed to prefix the statement that "caused" the contradiction with a not
_	Five more manifestos followed; they were more specific in their negative than their positive aspects, and carried the concept of Spatialism little further than the statement that its essence consisted in "plastic emotions and emotions of colour projected upon space".
_	Gingrich then added to the statement that: "The brazen redefinition of Mueller's task tells you how arrogant the deep state is and how confident it is it can get away with anything".
_	Cauchy completeness is the statement that every Cauchy sequence of real numbers converges.
_	The concept which has become known as the Piast Idea, the chief proponent of which was Jan Ludwik Popławski, is based on the statement that the Piast homeland was inhabited by so-called "native" aboriginal Slavs and Slavonic Poles since time immemorial and only later was "infiltrated" by "alien" Celts, Germans, Baltic peoples and others.
_	Equivalently, it is the statement that formula_130, i.e. that formula_131 is a Hermitian operator (as follows by integrating by parts twice).
_	Rhiannon Lucy Cosslett of "The Guardian" claimed that Milifandom represented the ""meme-ification" of politics," and its members were making the statement that "I am progressive and I follow politics with a keen sense of irony.
_	The addition of the empty string allows the statement that the context sensitive languages are a proper superset of the context-free languages, rather than having to make the weaker statement that all context-free grammars with no →λ productions are also context sensitive grammars.
_	Verses 14–15 assert ontological oneness between Shakti, Shiva and Atman, with the statement that through "knowledge that the self becomes one with Cosmic being".
_	But Tamang replies with the statement that "the dangerous game is about to begin".
_	The ARS reported that less than 50% of gun owners polled believed the NRA represented their interests, while 67% of them somewhat or strongly agreed with the statement that it had been "overtaken by lobbyists and the interests of gun manufacturers and lost its original purpose and mission."
_	For example, to represent the statement that "All humans are mortal".
_	As mentioned in the introduction, François Proth released what he believed to be a proof of the statement that was later shown to be flawed.
_	Thus, the Erdős–Faber–Lovász conjecture is equivalent to the statement that any simple hypergraph with vertices has chromatic index (edge coloring number) at most .
_	He was particularly affected by Stace's essay "Man Against Darkness", which includes the statement that:
_	And the esteem in which Hoshaiah was held by his pupils may be gaged by the statement that, even after Johanan had himself become a great scholar and a famous teacher and no longer needed Hoshaiah's instruction, he continued visiting the master, who in the meantime had grown old and had removed his school to Cæsarea (Yer. Sanh. xi. 30b).
_	The political website "Political Realm" summed up Tancredo's campaign profile with the statement that "In the end, Tancredo is a single-issue candidate and that will not be enough to carry him over the top."
_	This process culminates in the statement that "the number of planets in our galaxy on which a technological civilization is now in being is roughly 530,000."
_	In 2002, Jeffrey Lagarias proved that the Riemann hypothesis is equivalent to the statement that
_	As an example of the transfer principle, the statement that for any nonzero number "x", "2x" ≠ "x", is true for the real numbers, and it is in the form required by the transfer principle, so it is also true for the hyperreal numbers.
_	Mueller stands against the statement that convergence is really a takeover of all forms of media by one technology: digital computers.
_	While he did not campaign for induction, he did make the statement that, "Had I been elected after my death, I had made arrangements that my name never be placed in the Hall of Fame."
_	There is no truth in the statement that the police had instructions which led them to terrorise and maltreat the women.
_	To liken the design on the 30-cent stamp to "a bunch of rags hung out of a junk shop" as least raises an aesthetic issue; but the statement that the 2-cent stamp represented "Booth's Death ride into Maryland" is surely defamation pure and simple, indicating an agenda that has little to do with the question of stamp design.
_	In the same letter she described "Lady Chatterley's Lover" as an "insignificant, dirty little book", and rounded out her letter with the statement that she preferred Chanel Number 5 to having her nose "nailed to other people's lavatories".
_	However, the exact date was removed the next day with the statement that a new release date is forthcoming, and the pre-order items were removed.
_	The equivalence of determinantal rank and column rank is a strengthening of the statement that if the span of "n" vectors has dimension "p," then "p" of those vectors span the space (equivalently, that one can choose a spanning set that is a "subset" of the vectors): the equivalence implies that a subset of the rows and a subset of the columns simultaneously define an invertible submatrix (equivalently, if the span of "n" vectors has dimension "p," then "p" of these vectors span the space "and" there is a set of "p" coordinates on which they are linearly independent).
_	Although he does not directly voice these beliefs, Hamann allows the "Nebuchadnezzar" to leave Zion to contact the Oracle – Hamann explains this to Lock with the statement that he "believes their survival depends on more than how many ships (they) have", openly demonstrating his disagreement with Lock's reliance on brute force.
_	The first issue dated 31 July 1837 contained the statement that the paper would "bear a faithful and uncompromising testimony against the superstition and idolatry of the Church of Rome" and "proclaim the glorious truths of the Gospel.
_	The extract refers to the period from the reign of Domitian (81–96) to that of Trajan (98–117), and includes the statement that two Desposyni brought before Domitian later became leaders of the churches:
_	The fact that he was well versed in Jewish traditions, on which he wrote much, probably gave rise to the statement that he was a Jew, although he might have acquired his knowledge from his teacher Ibn 'Abbas.
_	He tersely explained his successive actions to investigators on December 14 with the statement that he was "capturing them first, and what developed developed."
_	Enrique is the sole authority for the statement that John the Hunter sent an embassy to the King of France, Charles VI, evidently before 1393, to request that he send two men from his Consistori at Toulouse to found one at Barcelona.
_	At the request of the bishop and his clergy, whose ranks had been recruited from the north, soldiers were quartered on the frequenters of conventicles to compel their attendance at church, and there appears to be good authority for the statement that Sir James Turner, the officer in command, "was obliged to go beyond his instructions to satisfy the bishop".
_	In the mathematical field of graph theory, Grötzsch's theorem is the statement that every triangle-free planar graph can be colored with only three colors.
_	The fable’s Latin version by Phaedrus is prefaced by the statement that the powerful should fear revenge from the humble that they harm.
_	Testifying in this case, Arpaio stated he could not deny making the statement that even if he had a billion dollars he wouldn't change the way he runs his jails.
_	He frequently ends a section with the statement that one should return to Kant.
_	More specifically, the Green's function can be written as formula_96 giving the "n"-th component of formula_18 at formula_98 from a point dipole current in the "m"-th direction at formula_99 (essentially, formula_100 gives the matrix elements of formula_101), and Rayleigh-Carson reciprocity is equivalent to the statement that formula_102.
_	According to Jeanne-Louise-Henriette Campan, the Queen refused it with the statement that the money would be better spent equipping a man-of-war.
_	This is equivalent to the statement that the cause and its effect are separated by a timelike interval, and the effect belongs to the future of its cause.
_	Among his closest friends were the novelists Rodrigo Fresán and Enrique Vila-Matas; Fresán's tribute included the statement that "Roberto emerged as a writer at a time when Latin America no longer believed in utopias, when paradise had become hell, and that sense of monstrousness and waking nightmares and constant flight from something horrid permeates "2666" and all his work."
_	Stanford rejects this, noting that the gospel-writers follow Judas's name with the statement that he betrayed Jesus, so it would be redundant for them to call him "the false one" before immediately stating that he was a traitor.
_	Robert Anderson prefaced his "A complete edition of the poets of Great Britain" (1795) with the statement that “When a new collection of English poetry is offered to the public, it will doubtless be inquired what are the deficiencies of preceding collections.”
_	After the publication of the book, Jean Charest, a former Cabinet minister under Mulroney and former premier of Quebec, came to his defence in a press conference, saying that he agreed with the statement that "Nobody has achievements like this ... you cannot name a Canadian prime minister who has done as many significant things as I did, because there are none."
_	In 1906, Mackenzie King published a book "The Secret of Heroism" about his friend whom he recalled in his diary entries as "the man I loved as I have loved no other man, my father and brother alone excepted"In 1909, King's first speech before the House of Commons was preceded by the statement that he marked the eighth anniversary of Harper's sacrifice by placing ten white roses on the base of the statue.
_	A substantial majority of Canadians (76%) were found to agree with the statement that the bill was drafted in the US.
_	The Collatz conjecture is equivalent to the statement that, for all formula_33 in formula_39, there exists an integer formula_51 such that formula_52.
_	Shakespeare also places the statement that there is a "futility of fighting against sensuality".
_	"dx" ≠ 0, since "dx" is nonzero, and the transfer principle can be applied to the statement that the square of any nonzero number is nonzero.
_	Calla Wahlquist of The Guardian makes similar comments, that "Pezzato does weird things with camera angles", and that "the English dubbing is not great", but counterpoints it with the statement that "the visual effects are, in many places, better than the multimillion-dollar Warner Brothers movies.
_	Among these include the statement that games on early access should be in a playable alpha or beta state, there are clear expectations of what the final product of the game will be like, and that the developer intends to continue work on the game, and can be financial stable to ultimately release a finished product.
_	On 14 July, following a phone call between Siniora and President Bush, the Prime Minister’s office issued the statement that “Prime Minister Siniora called on President Bush to exert all his efforts on Israel to stop its aggression on Lebanon, reach a comprehensive ceasefire and lift its blockade.”
_	Three months later the paper published a 1,200 word response from Vidal, which included the statement that, with regard to the controversial scene's subtext, he had been delegated to inform Boyd (who was "delighted"), but that Wyler had warned "don't tell Chuck because he'll fall apart".
_	The text ends with the statement that the reader now has to wait until he has unlocked it.
_	The first time any player attends Tribal Council, its members are each given a torch and told to light it from the fire pit, with the statement that "fire represents your life in this game".
_	The subsystem WKL consists of RCA plus a weak form of König's lemma, namely the statement that every infinite subtree of the full binary tree (the tree of all finite sequences of 0's and 1's) has an infinite path.
_	The 5-2 decision of the Court of Appeals was an utter defeat for the president, and the papers highlighted the statement that the president was not "above the law's commands."
_	If is not divisible by , Fermat's little theorem is equivalent to the statement that is an integer multiple of , or in symbols:
_	Then the Schur–Weyl duality is the statement that the space of two-tensors decomposes into symmetric and antisymmetric parts, each of which is an irreducible module for "GL":
_	In modern reprints, George still wants to be a boy, but the statement that her short hair makes her look like a boy has been removed as it is now considered offensive to assume that girls need long hair to be considered feminine.
_	The time of his birth and death is unknown, but all accounts agree in the statement that he flourished () during the period between the Peloponnesian War and the accession of Philip II of Macedon, so that he lived between 420 and 348 BC.
_	A "Calvin and Hobbes" strip dealt with this phenomenon, concluding with the statement that "Verbing weirds language", demonstrating the verbing of both "verb" and "weird".
_	However, that PCA is a useful relaxation of k-means clustering was not a new result (see, for example,), and it is straightforward to uncover counterexamples to the statement that the cluster centroid subspace is spanned by the principal directions.
_	It seems that Abraham of Vilna believed literally in the statement that the eighty concubines of King Solomon ("Shir ha-Shirim Rabbah" 6:8) meant eighty "midrashim."
_	This is equivalent to the statement that the map formula_4 → formula_8 from X to the function space of maps formula_2 → formula_4, not necessarily preserving the base point, given by sending a point formula_11 of formula_4 to the constant map whose image is formula_11 is a weak equivalence.
_	By including in it the statement that the "King's Evil" had been cured by the Pretender, Carte lost the favour of most of his patrons.
_	The order in which each model walks out wearing a specific outfit is usually planned in accordance to the statement that the designer wants to make about their collection.
_	Thus, "the statement that talk is not anywhere valued equally in all social contexts suggests a research strategy for discovering and describing cultural or subcultural differences in the value of speaking.
_	which is equivalent to the statement that and are the roots of the equation:
_	Addison's "Essays on the Imagination" contributed to the "Spectator", though they belong to popular literature, contain the germ of scientific analysis in the statement that the pleasures of imagination (which arise originally from sight) fall into two classes — (1) primary pleasures, which entirely proceed from objects before our eyes; and (2) secondary pleasures, flowing from the ideas of visible objects.
_	Herbert Spencer, Jowett, and Robert Leslie Ellis understood, I feel sure; and a few others, but nearly all the logicians and mathematicians ignored [953] the statement that the book was meant to throw light on the nature of the human mind; and treated the formula entirely as a wonderful new method of reducing to logical order masses of evidence about external fact.
_	During the municipal court process, Waller made the statement that “What happened Dec. 29, 1966, occurred as a result of a program I initiated to bring the plight of my people to the attention of the people of St. Petersburg…
_	He read the statement that Tancredo had written for his inauguration, preaching national conciliation and the installation of a constituent national assembly.
_	The purpose of the book was to prove wrong the statement that "the achievements of women painters have been second-rate."
_	According to 1995 survey by Lake Research and Tarrance Group, 64% of U.S. Catholics say they disapprove of the statement that "abortion is morally wrong in every case".
_	A strong form of the second incompleteness theorem, proved by Pavel Pudlák, who was building on earlier work by Solomon Feferman, states that no consistent theory T that contains Robinson arithmetic, Q, can interpret Q plus Con(T), the statement that T is consistent.
_	Barnette's conjecture is also equivalent to the statement that the vertices of the dual of every cubic bipartite polyhedral graph can be partitioned into two subsets whose induced subgraphs are trees.
_	67% of the Native Americans (n=66) polled agreed with the statement that "Redskins" is racial or racist.
_	That was more like an event than a film, just to make the statement that, if you really wanted to, you could actually make a film for nothing.
_	The charge concludes with the statement that the traffic is being carried on with the indifference if not the closed-eye compliance of some American officials and there is no likelihood of its being shut down in the foreseeable future."
_	Kimiko and Francisca return to Francisca's home but Kimiko is put off at Francisca's description of the death of her mother and the statement that she murdered her father.
_	The essay included the statement that Jews did not do their part in terms of fighting in America's armed forces:
_	The agent also made the statement that turnover of lunch bar would be $1,000 per week if deep fryer was installed.
_	The main conjecture of Iwasawa theory (now a theorem due to Barry Mazur and Andrew Wiles) is the statement that the Kubota–Leopoldt "p"-adic "L"-function and an arithmetic analogue constructed by Iwasawa theory are essentially the same.
_	In more general situations where both analytic and arithmetic "p"-adic "L"-functions are constructed (or expected), the statement that they agree is called the main conjecture of Iwasawa theory for that situation.
_	In the 2006 general election, AAEV's free-time political ads endorsed the New Democratic Party, counterbalanced by the statement that voters could also vote for AAEV party leader Liz White in Toronto Centre.
_	Rather, this power is implied by the statement that Acts of the Scottish Parliament are law to the extent that they are not "outside the legislative competence of the Parliament," without any subsequent reservation of the power to make subordinate legislation.
_	These conditions are equivalent to the statement that "μ" is given by a translation-invariant measure on "V", and they can be rephrased as
_	That same year pollster John Zogby found that 43% of Democrats "agreed with the statement that abortion 'destroys a human life and is manslaughter.'"
_	The cost to the taxpayer was criticised, with a ComRes poll showing that 76% of people in the UK agreed with the statement that 'The Pope is a religious figure so the taxpayer should not be contributing to the costs of his visit'.
_	F is the statement that every normal function on the ordinals has a regular fixed point.
_	If a bank were to raise the interest rate on a savings account from 3% to 4%, the statement that "the interest rate was increased by 1%" is ambiguous and should be avoided.
_	The court rejected his request under the statement that regardless of the claim about the connection between the films, there is no legal basis to deny the screening of "The Road to Jenin".
_	Ernst Hartert was only half-joking when in 1910 he summarized this attitude with the statement that, in the passerines: ""Was man nicht unterbringen kann, sieht man als Timalien an.""
_	While Mormons might agree with the statement that the Father and the Son are "uncreated", their understanding of "creation" differs from that of traditional Christianity.
_	The impossibility of doubling the cube is therefore equivalent to the statement that is not a constructible number.
_	This phrase was removed in the amended resolution and replaced with the statement that African American language systems "have origins in West and Niger-Congo languages and are not merely dialects of English."
_	Sydler's theorem that volume and the Dehn invariant are the only invariants for Euclidean dissection is represented homologically by the statement that the group formula_38 appearing in this sequence is actually zero.
_	The nekomata of the mountains have a tendency to be larger in later literature, and in the "", nekomata captured in the mountains of the Kii Province are as large as a wild boar, and in "" from 1775 (Anei 4), from the statement that their roaring voice echos throughout the mountain, they can be seen to be as big as a lion or a leopard.
_	The Union of South American Nations and various Latin American nations – including Bolivia, Cuba, Nicaragua, and El Salvador's Farabundo Martí National Liberation Front (FMLN) – condemned the attack and expressed solidarity, as did notable Latin American and international personalities including the former Cuban President Raúl Castro, FARC's Rodrigo Londoño, former footballer Diego Maradona, former Iranian President Mahmoud Ahmadinejad, noted sociologist Atilio Borón, and Evo Morales, who tweeted the statement that "[a]fter the failure in their attempt to overthrow him democratically, economically, politically and militarily, now the empire and its servants threaten his life" about Maduro's opponents.
_	The only specific description offered is the statement that "triplet subdivisions contrast with duple subdivisions."
_	The board rejected the offer with the statement that the Old Norse motif was more appropriate for the Museum of National Antiquities, which at the time still shared the same building as Nationalmuseum.
_	This tension was revived by the hacking saga of Qatar News Agency and the statement that was attributed to Sheikh Tamim bin Hamad.
_	The only reference made by the "Anglo-Saxon Chronicle" to the Northumbrians in this period is the statement that in 829 Egbert of Wessex "led an army against the Northumbrians as far as Dore, where they met him, and offered terms of obedience and subjection, on the acceptance of which they returned home", thereby, at least temporarily, extending Egbert's hegemony to the entirety of Anglo-Saxon Britain.
_	Some theologians argue the statement that the "land of Judah" will terrify the Egyptians is not a reference to a large army from Judah attacking Egypt but a circumlocution for the place where God lives.
_	Indeed, since the column vectors of "A" are the row vectors of the transpose of "A", the statement that the column rank of a matrix equals its row rank is equivalent to the statement that the rank of a matrix is equal to the rank of its transpose, i.e., rk("A") = rk("A").
_	Tait, in 1880, showed that the four color theorem is equivalent to the statement that a certain type of graph (called a snark in modern terminology) must be non-planar.
_	The announcement included the statement that girls in Cub Scouting will simply be called "Cub Scouts" but that a name would need to be given to the new Boy Scout equivalent program for girls that will launch in February 2019; the name will be "Scouts BSA".
_	Titled "The Global Divide on Homosexuality," the survey conducted by the Pew Research Center showed that 73% of adult Filipinos agreed with the statement that "homosexuality should be accepted by society," up by nine percentage points from 64% in 2002.
_	Combe modestly starts with the statement that the case had already been presented by "my distinguished preceptor and friend Dr Kellie".
_	Resting upon the statement that only direct discipleship leads to eternal life, the Primitive Church established a system of obedience toward Jesus' apostles just after Jesus' death.
_	This is reflected in the statement that as little as 10 USD positively benefits 10,000 people by enabling regular village visits.
_	In a posting on its website after the puzzle was aired on the WNYC radio show in New York; Beer, 7Up, and Whiskey was given as a solution with the statement that beer with 7Up makes shandy, beer with whiskey makes a boilermaker and whiskey with 7Up is a 7 & 7, but the three together would "make you sick".
_	The story ends with the statement that Dickstein has left Mossad to settle with Suza in Israel.
_	In this epistle John condemns such doctrines in no uncertain terms with the statement that such persons were antichrist.
_	Included in his recommendation was the statement that
_	He said he was "going to expose the most powerful, most highly financed lobby in Washington, the far left environmental extremists", and laid out in detail his opposition to attribution of recent climate change to humans, using the word "hoax" four times including the statement that he had "offered compelling evidence that catastrophic global warming is a hoax", and his conclusion expressing his belief that "manmade global warming is the greatest hoax ever perpetrated on the American people".
_	The Church of the SubGenius has responded to these complaints with the statement that it is not a non-profit church:
_	In November 2006 the widow of the deceased Liudvika Pociūnienė asked to resume the cancelled investigation as she considered that the investigation had not been objective and thorough (e.g., she remembered the fact that the statement that V.
_	The appeal was rejected with the statement that the trial judge's approach could not be faulted and that even more Draconian whole-life tariffs had been upheld in other cases of whole families being murdered – including that of Jeremy Bamber.
_	In combinatorics, the Cameron–Erdős conjecture (now a theorem) is the statement that the number of sum-free sets contained in formula_1 is formula_2
_	The release ended with the statement that "It may take some considerable time for John to complete his work, but we have no doubt that when this happens it will prove a significant addition to our knowledge of Fig-Parrots".
_	The letter included the statement that ""[...] without any reasonable grounds and undeserved [...] reason [...] deprived of Professor opportunities for teaching and research work [...] dismissal of Warsaw University of Technology [...] was very hurtful and disgraceful"".
_	In an interview for "", Stanley made the statement that, "People were now listening with their eyes rather than their ears, mainly because "Creatures of the Night" was arguably a better album than "Lick It Up".
_	He also made the statement that, "The only reason why I think people bought "Lick It Up" more than "Creatures of the Night" was because we had no make-up on.
_	The Respondent goes on to quote Congress' contemporary assertion that the HHCA "affirm[ed] the trust relationship between the United States and the Native Hawaiians" (42 U.S.C. § 11701 (13)) as well as the statement that "In recognition of the special relationship which exists between the United States and the Native Hawaiian people, [it] has extended to Native Hawaiians the same rights and privileges accorded to American Indian, Alaska Native, Eskimo, and Aleut communities" (20 U.S.C. § 7902(13)) (both as quoted in Respondent's Brief, 8-9).
_	In mathematics, the Weil conjecture on Tamagawa numbers is the statement that the Tamagawa number τ("G") of a simply connected simple algebraic group defined over a number field is 1.
_	Lie algebra is equivalent to the statement that the 2-generator free Lie algebra is SQ-universal (in the category of Lie algebras).
_	These reprisals were caused by the statement that all Germans collectively collaborated with the German-Nazi occupiers which was not true.
_	A 2013 survey conducted by the Pew Research Center showed that 73% of adult Filipinos agreed with the statement that "homosexuality should be accepted by society," up by nine percentage points from 64 percent in 2002.
_	From this point of view, we can think of linear combinations as the most general sort of operation on a vector space – saying that a vector space is an algebra over the operad of linear combinations is precisely the statement that "all possible" algebraic operations in a vector space are linear combinations.
_	But the statement that made headlines in newspapers across the country was Day's acknowledgment that he would indeed consider using the Notwithstanding Clause to block a Supreme Court decision legalizing same-sex marriage, then a distinct possibility that was unnerving many social conservatives.
_	Some authors from the United States have made the statement that attraction to the female breast is a sexual fetish, that it is the American fetish-object of choice, and that breast fetishism is predominantly found in the United States.
_	Statements in this class include the statement that P = NP, the Riemann hypothesis, and many other unsolved mathematical problems.
_	The narrative ends with the statement that many of the witnesses to this event "believed in him."
_	The "Neiye" opens with the statement that" jing" "vital essence" is the source of life.
_	The second part of Cicero's phrase, ""in casibus non exceptis"" or "in cases not excepted," is almost always missing from modern uses of the statement that "the exception proves the rule," which may contribute to frequent confusion and misuse of the phrase.
_	They begin with the statement that natural selection is necessarily responsible for complex biological adaptations, including that extremely complex class of biological phenomena that are human psychological mechanisms.
_	Clifford's theorem is then the statement that this is non-negative.
_	"The docetic note in this narrative appears in the statement that Jesus, while being crucified, 'remained silent, as though he felt no pain', and in the account of his death.
_	Smith had already made the statement that "I do not whip dogs, otherwise I'd step down and whip you".
_	vanish for |"n"| large enough, and that this in turn is equivalent to the statement that all the translates
_	A study conducted by Frederick J. Zimmerman and Janice F. Bell made the statement that "Commercial television pushes little children to eat a large quantity of those foods they should consume least: sugary cereals, snacks, fast food and soda pop".
_	Little is known about them, other than the implication that they have the power and will to aid Candy in her inadvertent quest to save the Abarat from Christopher Carrion and his grandmother and the statement that they constantly study and protect the history of the universe.
_	The main theorem of elimination theory is the statement that for any and any algebraic variety defined over , the projection map formula_2 sends Zariski-closed subsets to Zariski-closed subsets.
_	This is one possible interpretation of the statement that Ishmael slew Gedaliah ‘because Nebuchadnezzar had appointed him governor’ (Jeremiah 41:2).
_	According to an Associated Press Poll conducted in July 2003, 71% of U.S. citizens agreed with the statement that the space program is "a good investment", compared to 21% who did not.
_	The saying is also employed in the novel "The Unbearable Lightness of Being", by Milan Kundera, where it is glossed with the statement that "If we only have one life to live, we might as well not have lived at all."
_	She has stated that, although her family is Catholic, she has not been christened and is not religious, instead agreeing with the statement that, "we're just minuscule dots in the vast cosmic emptiness of the universe".
_	Let us prove the statement that
_	Jackson made the statement that the company would instead focus on selling BMW, Mercedes and Lexus vehicles due to anticipation of further market share loss by US automakers resulting in high dealer inventories.
_	The 2010 European Social Survey found that 38% of Croatians agreed with the statement that "gay men and lesbians should be free to live their own lives as they wish".
_	The axiom of choice is equivalent to the statement that every set can be well-ordered, i.e. that every cardinal has an initial ordinal.
_	Joe Wizan, the studio's head of production, rejected it with the statement that Fox didn't make "rural movies".
_	This argument is often paired with the statement that this is how society prevents social unrest (fitna).
_	In mathematics, the axiom of choice, or AC, is an axiom of set theory equivalent to the statement that "the Cartesian product of a collection of non-empty sets is non-empty".
_	However, the statement that every model has a saturated elementary extension is not provable in ZFC.
_	Despite popular opinion that "freeway" means a road with at least two carriageways, single carriageway freeways exist, as is evidenced by the statement that "the roads include of dual carriageway freeway, of single carriageway freeway and of single carriage main road with unlimited access."
_	In 1996 the government adopted the "White Paper on National Defence", which included the statement that, "In accordance with the Constitution, the SANDF shall not discriminate against any of its members on the grounds of sexual orientation."
_	This agrees better with the writer's account of himself; but if the statement that he addressed "Elpine" to Edward VI when he was 18 years of age be taken to imply that the production of this work fell within that king's reign, the date of the author's birth cannot be placed anterior to 1529.
_	He made the statement that he wished "to seek the inter-relationship between the cogwheel and the bud."
_	Perhaps Derrida's most quoted and famous assertion, which appears in an essay on Rousseau in his book "Of Grammatology" (1967), is the statement that "there is no out-of-context" ("il n'y a pas de hors-texte").
_	The court further noted "the statement that 'Cooley grossly inflates its graduates' reported mean salaries' may not merely be protected hyperbole, but actually substantially true."
_	Marvin Harris, a historian of anthropology, begins "The Rise of Anthropological Theory" with the statement that anthropology is "the science of history".
_	To further discredit him, Enright also produced the statement that Stempel had signed earlier, declaring that "Twenty-One" was an honest program, that Barry and Enright were beyond reproach, and that no rigging had taken place.
_	The Pope begins with the statement that "the transmission of human life is a most serious role in which married people collaborate freely and responsibly with God the Creator."
_	In 2004, the statement that muzzles should not be overly pronounced was added to the breed standard.
_	The final Project 4.1 report began in its preface with the statement that "Operation CASTLE did not include a biomedical program" (it mentions this in discussing the ad hoc nature by which the project personnel were assembled).
_	The Royal Court defended the handing over with the statement that, "the king conveys the heir to the throne and hands her over to a man who has been accepted".
_	However, in 1862 Max Müller objected to this interpretation with the statement that there is no reason to assume that "yavana" meant "Greek" before and in the century Pāṇini lived, and it could as well have been a reference in a Semitic or a South Indian context.
_	In fact, as Hale’s account says, Nolan’s epitaph contained the statement that no man ever loved America more than he.
_	The Lindelöf hypothesis is equivalent to the statement that
_	In January 1563-4 he appears to have been living at Exeter, but the statement that he was a prebendary of Exeter and Wells is without foundation.
_	Private property appears to be assured by the statement that the "state protects the right of ownership," including the right of transfer and inheritance.
_	But Lief is clever and makes the statement that his head will be cut off.
_	The story ends with the statement that "she didn't do it, and now it's too late."
_	These two latest molecules say against the statement that long chain FFAs are not ligands of GPR84.
_	However, one factor must never be forgotten, and that is the statement that the New Testament is the criterion for measuring all subsequent revelations, and whatever is found to be contrary to it, must be and always has been, rejected by the Christian church.
_	To him enters Dr Oliver, with the story of the experiments on his boy, and, in particular, with the statement that injection under the skin of a glycerin extract from calf’s suprarenal gland was followed by a definite narrowing of the radial artery.
_	A 1985 survey of Protestant clergy in the United States by Jim M Alsdurf found that 21% of them agreed that "no amount of abuse would justify a woman's leaving her husband, ever," and 26% agreed with the statement that "a wife should submit to her husband and trust that God would honor her action by either stopping the abuse or giving her the strength to endure it."
_	In its first chapter, titled ""The Mystery of the Church,"" is the statement that:
_	Take the statement that the Evening Star is identical to the Morning Star.
_	In 1984, the United Methodist Church, at its General Conference, added to its "Book of Discipline" the statement that "no self-avowed, practicing homosexual shall be ordained or appointed in the United Methodist Church."
_	This is advocated by the statement that the industrial partners want to invest more in technology development, rather than manufacturing of the flying hardware and weapons, despite the risk of the loss of the single prototype.
_	According to Appian, Antony is responsible for the statement that Augustus sought to secure the goodwill of Cotiso, king of the Getae (Dacians) by giving him his daughter, and he himself marrying a daughter of Cotiso.
_	The "American Telephone Journal" account of the December 21 alternator-transmitter demonstration included the statement that "It is admirably adapted to the transmission of news, music, etc. as, owing to the fact that no wires are needed, simultaneous transmission to many subscribers can be effected as easily as to a few", echoing the words of a handout distributed to the demonstration witnesses, which stated "[Radio] Telephony is admirably adapted for transmitting news, stock quotations, music, race reports, etc. simultaneously over a city, on account of the fact that no wires are needed and a single apparatus can distribute to ten thousand subscribers as easily as to a few.
_	Another item that can be actively disliked is the statement that Malayalam, the erstwhile language of Travancore kingdom, and currently the state language of Kerala, is of very recent origin.
_	The designs were inspired by Thurston's geometrization conjecture, the statement that every 3-manifold can be decomposed into pieces with one of eight different uniform geometries, a proof of which had been sketched in 2003 by Grigori Perelman as part of his proof of the Poincaré conjecture.
_	Pickens frequently makes the statement that "the battery won't move an eighteen wheeler" although batteries, electric drivetrain, and engines for heavy vehicles exist in hybrid buses and a hybrid version of the military's HEMTT heavy lift vehicle.
_	Weil's criterion is the statement that the positivity of a certain function is equivalent to the Riemann hypothesis.
_	This objection the loyal Jew meets with the statement that non-Jews also are usurers, and that they impose upon members of their own faith, while rich Jews lend money to their coreligionists without any interest whatever.
_	Many believed that the song's figuratively violent lyrics promoted actual physical violence which the band did not deny but rather affirmed with the statement that any such violence was "well directed".
_	Thus for a fixed point formula_8 the condition that a conic contains the point is a linear equation in the coefficients, which formalizes the statement that "passing through a point imposes a linear condition on conics".
_	The subtler statement that "five points in general linear position impose "independent" linear conditions on conics," and thus define a unique conic (as the intersection of five hyperplanes in 5-space is a point) corresponds to the statement that under the Veronese map, points in general position are mapped to points in general position, which corresponds to the fact that the map is biregular (and thus the image of points are in special position if and only if the points were originally in special position).
_	For his second wish, Nachiketa prefaces his request with the statement that heaven is a place where there is no fear, no anxiety, no old age, no hunger, no thirst, no sorrow.
_	David E. Hellawell, professor of Education Management at the University of Central England observed that the headmaster-as-autocrat attitude, related in one history of Oundle School by the statement that Sanderson's masters were required to "see eye to eye with him; if they did not they must go", would land a modern British headmaster in the local newspaper, and possibly in jail.
_	Lady Falkender sued Joe Haines for libel in 2007 over the statement that she was the author of the list.
_	For example, the statement that "those individuals who are employed and whose household equivalised disposable income is below 60% of national median equivalised income are poor" uses a relative measure to define poverty.
_	On 6 November 1915, while Palmer was still editor of "The Globe", the paper was suspended under the Defence of the Realm Act for repeating the statement that Lord Kitchener had tendered his resignation as Secretary for War even though this had been officially denied by the press bureau.
_	In the US only 32% of respondents agreed with the statement that forces beyond their personal control determine their success.
_	His famous Last Theorem was first discovered by his son in the margin in his father's copy of an edition of Diophantus, and included the statement that the margin was too small to include the proof.
_	In special relativity, conservation of energy–momentum corresponds to the statement that the energy–momentum tensor is divergence-free.
_	A survey was conducted of 400 individuals, with 98 individuals positively identified as Native Americans, finding that 67% agreed with the statement that "Redskins" is racial or racist.
_	"Washington Post" editor Fred Hiatt eventually retracted and deleted the cartoon and replaced it with the statement that "It's generally been the policy of our editorial section to leave children out of it.
_	This point of view formalizes the notion that linear combinations are the most general sort of operation on a vector space – saying that a vector space is an algebra over the operad of linear combinations is precisely the statement that "all possible" algebraic operations in a vector space are linear combinations.
_	To further support the argument, George claims that the research on plant-based nutrition was "done almost entirely on men" to support the statement that one does not need to eat animal products for good health.
_	The account of Shō Nei, whose reign saw invasion and subjugation by Satsuma, opens with the statement that the kingdom had been in subordinate vassal status to the Shimazu clan since the Eikyō era.
_	Mathematically, this is expressed by the statement that the curl of the velocity vector field is everywhere equal to zero.
_	These facts prove the statement that this region had been populated by Georgian tribe called Gugars.
_	Karl Grismer counters criticisms of the factuality of Jose Gaspar (AKA Gasparilla) with the statement that the doubters have "no romance in their souls."
_	The Vaught conjecture is the statement that it is not possible for formula_5.
_	The eulogy of Vajjada II (1010 to 1015 A. D.) and the statement that Arikesarin was his younger brother, made in Thana plates of Arikesarin go against this, it is sometimes argued that Sindhuraja's intervention in Konkan was intended to establish the legitimate heir, viz, Arikesarin to the throne, but the argument does not hold much water.
_	An example of this is the statement that the Buddha is born "for the salvation of all beings".
_	They found that of 10,131 women surveyed, 0.5% of women agreed with the statement that they were "addicted" to pornography.
_	Li's criterion is then the statement that
_	The story ends with the statement that Orm and Toke in their old age "did never tire of telling of the years when they had rowed the Caliph's ship and served my lord Al-Mansur."
_	Similarly, if "the Joker realizes that Bruce Wayne is rich" is true, then it is also true that "the Joker realizes that Batman is rich"; if "the Joker doubts that Bruce Wayne is a threat" is true, then so is the statement that "the Joker doubts that Batman is a threat" and so forth.
_	The Veronese surface arises naturally in the study of conics, specifically in formalizing the statement that five points determine a conic.
_	The Gibbons–Hawking effect is the statement that a temperature can be associated to each solution of the Einstein field equations that contains a causal horizon.
_	As an example, the connectivity of an undirected graph can be expressed in MSO as the statement that, for every partition of the vertices into two nonempty subsets, there exists an edge from one subset to the other.
_	The exponential time hypothesis is equivalent to the statement that , and the question of whether M["i"] = W["i"] for "i" >
_	In one letter he wrote, “Abdul Aziz called and asked for an explanation of the statement that man was made ‘in the image of God,’ which shocked them.
_	The QET is a precise formulation of termed normal typicality, i.e. the statement that, for typical large systems, every initial wave function ψ0 from an energy shell is ‘normal’: it evolves in such a way that formula_69 for most t, is macroscopically equivalent to the micro-canonical density matrix.
_	At the Center for Indigenous Peoples Studies at California State University, San Bernardino a survey has conducted of 400 individuals whose identity as Native American was verified, finding that 67% agreed with the statement that "Redskins" is offensive and racist.
_	Sky, though, stresses in the statement that its focus lies on the expansion of its HD proposition.
_	At the time it was launched, there was some controversy regarding the possibility of vehicles equipped with CVT transmission be converted to flex fuel, since this was the statement that was made by Honda Motor of Brazil in the launch of the second generation Honda Fit in Brazil.
_	"In making the statement that you personally know that I am corrupt you lied.
_	A July 2014 poll of "battleground voters" across the United States found "77 percent in favor of full withdrawal from Afghanistan by the end of 2016; only 15 percent and 17 percent interested in more involvement in Syria and Ukraine, respectively; and 67 percent agreeing with the statement that, 'U.S. military actions should be limited to direct threats to our national security.'"
_	In regard to their alleged royal and Irish birth, James Henthorn Todd states “that we cannot place much reliance on the statement that they were the children of a king of Scotia.
_	In both 1992 and 2000 surveys, more than 80% of respondents agreed with the statement that second-hand smoke was harmful.
_	It opens with the statement that "Tea is the most wonderful medicine for nourishing one's health; it is the secret of long life."
_	The quintessential verbal expression of Judaism is the Shema Yisrael, the statement that the God of the Bible is their God, and that this God is unique and one.
_	This claim was only recorded in a fifteenth-century chronicle, however, and its details are uncertain, especially the statement that her corpse was in such a state of preservation that "when her paps [breasts] were pressed with hands, they rose up again."
_	In a January 2013 interview on CBC Radio's "The Current" she made the statement that the financial crisis of 2008 would not have occurred "if the world had been full of female traders," and attributes the mismanagement to testosterone.
_	Despite the statement that the track would be removed, "Look at Your Game, Girl" is still featured on pressings of the album.
_	[NOTE: This musician reader is in disagreement with the statement that "modal differences are not always so observable in these traditions," the implication of which is that differences in modes are frequently "not" observable.
_	Her mother then confronted and accused Princess Pingyang of sabotaging her daughter's marriage, but was simply brushed off with the statement that Empress Chen lost favour purely because of her own infertility.
_	In a poll of 350 board directors of UK businesses, published in June 2015, 82% agreed with the statement that "the UK's membership of the EU is good for British businesses", while 12% disagreed.
_	Brussels had opened the case with the statement that the Slovenian vignette violates prevailing EU rights and discriminates road users.
_	Pitchforkmedia were almost equally fulsome with praise, rewarding the album with a 91% score and the statement that "U.S. Maple have finally reached brilliance with "Acre Thrills", a gorgeously dangerous combination of everything they've seemed to strive for that now makes them imperfectly perfect."
_	The second verse uses a pun on the name of Jones and Laughlin Steel to ask what the company stole from its workers ("What did Jones and Laughlin steal?"), while the fourth and final verse ends with the statement that all of the mill workers are "joining up with the CIO."
_	While Joseph Smith indicated his belief in the curse of Ham theory in a parenthetical reference as early as 1831, however, the reference is not to the "curse or mark of Cain" as in the Pearl of Great Price, it is attributed to an act of genocide upon "the people of Shum" and includes the statement that after this act the descendent of Cain were shunned:
_	With regards to a complaint on the emphasis of culling healthy animals, committee ruled that while the film still included the statement that "it’s still enshrined in the Rhodesian Ridgeback Club’s code of ethics that ridgeless puppies shall be culled." the endboard which states that "Since the broadcast of Pedigree Dogs Exposed, the Kennel Club has introduced many changes…
_	The "s"-cobordism theorem can be reinterpreted as the statement that the set of connected components of this space is the Whitehead group of π("M").
_	His account of John's reign—which amounts to three paragraphs—concludes with the statement that it was "during his reign the Turks seized Chalybia and launched a great invasion, so that all those places became uninhabited."
_	On March 4 Nagin appeared before an audience of New Orleans evacuees at an event organized by the NAACP, where he made the statement that "there was all this talk about this being an opportunity to change New Orleans forever and maybe everybody shouldn't come back, and maybe this is an opportunity to kind of change New Orleans and go back to what it used to be.
_	Other than the statement that after he was 12 years old ()
_	He made the statement that "sumos don't eat bread", and the three men attacked Yagi, shoving his bread down his throat.
_	The delegates adopted a resolution ZAVNOBiH Proclamation and peoples of Bosnia and Herzegovina in the statement that the future of Bosnia and Herzegovina and its people at home and abroad, may represent the only ZAVNOBiH, and AVNOJ.
_	This result demonstrates that one can consider local realism as the statement that real states exist independently of the observer (realism), combined with the assumption that two separated systems each have their own states with local dynamics (locality).
_	M called into question the statement that the Coliseum technique could achieve the homogeneous distribution of heat.
_	However the statement that the Suibhne/Suibne/Uisseni are first mentioned in Ireland in the 14th Century as Galloglass of the O'Neil may be questioned by the much earlier reference to Suibhne/Suibne/Uisseni 901AD 903AD in various genealogies of the Ui Liathan sept the Ui Meic Caille where in The Annals of the Four Masters, O'Clery's book of Genealogies and Rawlinson to name but a few show Suibhne/Suibne/Uisseni appears as both lord and King of the Ui Meic Caille.
_	"Still more doubtful and more opposed to reasonable probability is the statement that 'our standards of beauty are largely derived from the contemplation of the numerous examples around us, which... have been created by the æsthetic preferences of the insect world'--alluding... to the colours and structures of flowers as being due to the need of attracting insects to fertilize them."
_	The Book 2 is introduced with the statement that great friendships can be destroyed by the cruel and envious beings who envy such friendship.
_	In August 1941, Churchill and Roosevelt met and signed the Atlantic Charter, which included the statement that "the rights of all peoples to choose the form of government under which they live" should be respected.
_	"Anyone who makes the statement that a hackamore is just another type of halter ... is simply admitting that he knows nothing about this fine piece of equipment."
_	In a survey of the Chilean public, 66.6% of participants disagreed with the statement that “if Peruvians get too mixed with Chileans, the quality of our people will worsen.”
_	The 'Ættartölur' account ends to a genealogy of Harald's royal descendants down to Olaf IV of Norway with the statement that the account was written in 1387, and with a list of the kings of Norway from this Olaf back to Harald Fair-hair.
_	Ahmadinejad reiterated the statement that Iranian waters had been breached, and he praised the border guards who detained the British personnel.
_	After much debate, the state legislative road committee included the statement that this route would follow the Feather River in the 1919 amendment authorizing a third bond issue; instead of keeping it as Route 30, the Highway Commission changed the designation to an extension of the short Richvale-Oroville (now SR 162) Route 21, which was also part of the first bond issue.
_	As of July 2016, not much information was available apart from the statement that such aircraft is planned for development, no official data was available concerning its capabilities.
_	R. Mordecai is authority for the statement that their settlement in the Sahara dates from the end of the seventh century, when 'Abd al-Malik ascended the throne and pushed his conquests as far as Morocco.
_	This is equivalent to the statement that "p""p"("C")"="C".
_	Regarding the code of ethics statement which says "Ridgeless puppies shall be culled at birth", the Club points to the statement that follows, "if a breeder finds this morally impossible the puppy shall be homed".
_	The article proved to be the public face of American foreign policy in the Cold War—even though Kennan himself noted that he felt that he was misunderstood—in the statement that the "United States policy toward the Soviet Union must be that of a long-term, patient but firm and vigilant containment of Russian expansive tendencies".
_	Since through this double orbit all the movements of the heavenly powers are determined, so all “becoming” and all life depend on it, and thus we can understand the statement that the World-Soul appears in the form of an X, or a cross.
_	Some authors use the term "Alexander trick" for the statement that every homeomorphism of formula_2 can be extended to a homeomorphism of the entire ball formula_1.
_	The representation of Bacchides by Josephus ("B.J." i. 1, §§ 2, 3) as barbarous by nature, and the statement that he was slain by Mattathias, are both erroneous.
_	In metadata, property equivalence is the statement that two properties have the same property extension or values.
_	The title of the book comes from the statement that, "in the future, the rain will never mess up your hair".
_	In early July 2007, parents criticised a cinema advertisement about the disappearance of Madeleine which showed a still picture of the girl with the statement that she had been "snatched" from her room.
_	The topological Vaught conjecture is the statement that whenever a Polish group acts continuously on a Polish space, there are either countably many orbits or continuum many orbits.
_	Historians have stated that this therefore casts great doubt on the veracity and independence of the statement that Baartman then made.
_	In the Huainanzi, there is the statement that "mōryō have a shape like that of a three-year-old little child, are dark red in color, have red eyes, long ears, and beautiful hair."
_	Quoting the statement that "Islam is an enemy of all freedom loving people" from an anarchist magazine, he argues that this is "no different to the bigoted rhetoric of George Bush or even BNP leader Nick Griffin".
_	At the Radiotelegraphic Convention meeting in London in 1912, the section of the Convention covering "Transmission of Radiograms" included the statement that "The signals to be employed are those of Morse International Code."
_	It is the authority for the statement that the royal prerogative is placed in abeyance (is not used) when statute law can provide a legal basis for an action.
_	In the case of Uzziah, however, the statement that after he was stricken with leprosy, his son Jotham had charge of the palace and governed the people of the land (2 Kings 15:5) is a fairly straightforward indication of what in modern terms is called a coregency.
_	"The characterization of the statement that I made does not reflect the context of the question that I was answering and certainly does not reflect my views throughout my lifetime.
_	The refusal of either side to admit responsibility for civilian casualties is satirised with the statement that three of the islanders were killed, but that "nobody was to blame".
_	Sixty-seven percent agreed with the statement that "elected officials trying to keep Schiavo alive are doing so more for political advantage than out of concern for her or for the principles involved."
_	A graph is perfect if and only if its complement is perfect, and Kőnig's theorem can be seen as equivalent to the statement that the complement of a bipartite graph is perfect.
_	Keller's conjecture is the statement that every cube tiling has at least one pair of tiles that meet face-to-face in this way.
_	For the statement that Moses did not die at all, compare Sotah 13b.
_	One example of many is Viscount Midleton, who appears as Lord Brodrick on the Roll, the title to which he has proved succession, with the statement that he is customarily known as Viscount Midleton and a cross-reference from 'Midleton'.
_	Many such theorems will not do so explicitly, as usually stated in standard mathematical language – for example, the statement that the sine function is continuous; or any theorem written in big O notation.
_	In 1982, Steve Mahaney published his proof that the nonexistence of sparse NP-complete languages (with NP-completeness defined in the standard way using many-one reductions) is in fact equivalent to the statement that P ≠ NP; this is Mahaney's theorem.
_	Formally, the statement that "value decreases over time" is given by defining the linear differential operator formula_54 as:
_	This traditional kind of presentation of the basis of thermodynamics includes ideas that may be summarized by the statement that heat transfer is purely due to spatial non-uniformity of temperature, and is by conduction and radiation, from hotter to colder bodies.
_	And so, the recommendations for Pegram to be promoted were returned with the statement that "the artillery could not lose the services of so valuable an officer."
_	Some have pointed out that he qualified his statements on the constitution with the statement that this is a personal suggestion.
_	The first chorus makes the statement that "everyone can dream freely," and that "dreams come true, not by magic, but through your own strength."
_	For example, the statement that insertion sort requires O("n") comparisons is meaningless without defining "n", which in this case is the number of elements in the input list.
_	For example the Hermite–Lindemann theorem becomes the statement that any nonzero element of "L" is transcendental.
_	On all occasions, American Eagle prevailed in court under the statement that A&F cannot stop American Eagle from presenting similar designs, since such designs cannot be copyrighted in the United States.
_	Trump rebutted the statement that had been issued by May's office, Tweeting, "Don't focus on me, focus on the destructive Radical Islamic Terrorism that is taking place within the United Kingdom, We are doing just fine!"
_	The length formula_9 equals the sum of the lengths formula_10 and formula_11, so this equation simplifies algebraically to the statement that formula_12.
_	However, Capcom later revised this press release, as it was incorrect, with the statement that they were "looking into adding new features to the game, including possible additions of several new characters from both Capcom and Tatsunoko and [...] exploring the option of online gameplay."
_	And in the other direction, this form of the theorem implies the statement that there can be no infinite antichains, because an infinite antichain is a set that does not contain any pair related by the minor relation.
_	To this end he "added some touches where surviving tradition seemed to contain trustworthy additional particulars," such as the statement that Paul taught in the lecture-room of Tyrannus "from the fifth to the tenth hour" (added to Acts 19:9).
_	The government of Tanganyika (present-day Tanzania) called on United Nations action with the statement that "After the brutal murder of President Olympio, the problem of recognition of a successor government has arisen.
_	Some of the claims have been criticized or ridiculed, for instance the statement that giant squids had left scars on whales of two feet in diameter.
_	However, I missed the statement that each community is based on its moral code.
_	Folkman's theorem, the statement that there exist arbitrarily large sets of integers all of whose nonempty sums are monochromatic, may be seen as a special case of Rado's theorem concerning the regularity of the system of equations
_	Lanti justified this in Chapter 5 of "La Laborista Esperantismo" with the statement that "disseminating anationalism among those who differ by language would be as foolish as teaching literature to illiterates".
_	Poincaré never declared whether he believed this additional condition would characterize the 3-sphere, but nonetheless, the statement that it does is known as the Poincaré conjecture.
_	This is equivalent to the statement that every nonempty perfect subset of "E" contains a portion on which "f" is absolutely continuous.
_	In "Ester Hath Hanged Haman" Sowernam finds that Swetnam has incorrectly stated that the Bible is the source of the statement that women are a necessary evil and finds that the true source is in Euripides’ Medea.
_	This is the meaning of the statement that general relativity is the unique theory (up to conditions on dimensionality, locality, etc.) of a massless spin-2 field.
_	formula_1 is also equivalent over formula_20 to the statement that every pruned tree with formula_25 levels has a branch ("proof below").
_	The head of the Massachusetts committee, Walter Spooner, commented on the actions of Col Hinman in this difficult situation with the statement that “from the polite, generous, and manly disposition of Colonel Hinman,
_	The 2010 survey also showed that 52% disagreed with the statement that wind farms are "ugly and a blot on the landscape".
_	When speaking of the dedicated workers, M. Salles, the son-in-law of Eiffel made the statement that "no soldier on the battle field deserved better mention than these humble toilers, who, will never go down in history."
_	The tale ends with the statement that Curunír was obliged to take Aiwendil [Radagast] with him to please Yavanna, Aulë's wife, and that Alatar took Pallando as a friend.
_	Snopes, a website that documents and debunks urban legends and rumors, identified Ralston as the source for the statement that Sanders supporters had thrown chairs and said there was no evidence to support it.
_	In a post on tumblr Grillo-Marxuach made the statement that they will be "fully exploring a relationship that could only be shown subtextually in first-run syndication in the 1990s," which several websites such as "The Guardian" and "Newsweek" have taken it to mean "Xena will be an out and proud lesbian."
_	Filmer's theory is founded upon the statement that the government of a family by the father is the true origin and model of all government.
_	The conjecture is equivalent to the statement that every algebra norm on "C"("X") is equivalent to the usual uniform norm.
_	Although the statement that was released did not directly criticise the perceived "dominance" of the US dollar – something that Russia had criticised in the past – it did spark a fall in the value of the dollar against other major currencies.
_	Charles Scribner's Sons issued the statement that:
_	Heisenberg's uncertainty principle is represented by the statement that the operators corresponding to certain observables do not commute.
_	On the other hand, the statement that the Son 'was not a creature like the other creatures' was familiar to Arians, and could be taken to accept the Arian belief that the Son was a creature of God, though a special and unique creature.
_	In mathematics, the equidistribution theorem is the statement that the sequence
_	It was also declared in the statement that the association of the name "Chung Cheng" is out of pure coincidence.
_	In the proof based on fundamental groups of bouquets, for instance, the axiom of choice appears in the guise of the statement that every connected graph has a spanning tree.
_	If we view the DFT as just a coordinate transformation which simply specifies the components of a vector in a new coordinate system, then the above is just the statement that the dot product of two vectors is preserved under a unitary DFT transformation.
_	In February 2009, Cowling bought all remaining shares in the club, claiming that "I have to do what is best for the club", adding to the statement that he "has tremendous respect for the current board and administration team, and recognises their amazing achievements taking the team from the Conference to the Championship with extremely limited resources".
_	Rubio defended these remarks the following day, saying with respect to the statement that Obama "knows exactly what he's doing" that "It's what I believe and it's what I'm going to continue to say, because it happens to be one of the main reasons why I am running."
_	For instance, a relatively large fraction of people accept human evolution in Kazakhstan (79%) and Lebanon (78%), but relatively few in Afghanistan (26%), Iraq (27%), and Pakistan (30%); a total of 13 of the countries surveyed had at least 50% of the population surveyed who agreed with the statement that humans evolved over time.
_	This was justified by the statement that according to the current legal situation, the preventative detention can only be ordered to an indispensable protection of the general public.
_	The credo includes a list of what Knopf's beliefs for publishing including the statement that he never published an unworthy book.
_	After a trial in which he had repeatedly refused to participate in giving evidence in his defense beyond addressing the court at the trial's commencement with the statement that he had acted for "Volk & Fuhrer", and engaging in a Nazi salute, on 11 March 1943 he was sentenced to death for High Treason against South Africa.
_	After deliberating on the statement that "the law is for human beings but not for monsters", the father finally agrees to join his son in his fight against the corrupt minister.
_	He first mentions them in the statement that ""Conmhal mac Ebhir, ri Ereann, do bhris cath Locha Lén for Eurna, Mairtine, agus for Moghruith mac Mofebhis d'Fearuibh Bolg""/""Conmhal (Conmáel) s.
_	Finally, the statement that "CD interest rates closely track inflation" is not necessarily true.
_	This time, Hajyano sexually abused the man’s wife, according to the statement that he gave investigators.
_	First there is a statement that the legislative body was consulted by the appropriate magistrate in due form; then follows the text of the law; and finally the sanction, the statement that the law was passed.
_	This older version of his creation originated with George Lucas, and both versions were harmonized from the outset: in 1977, Lucas provided a guide for early Expanded Universe creators, in which C-3PO's origin on Affa was established, and also the statement that he was "totally reassembled by a young boy working for a junk dealer" before joining the Alderaanian diplomatic corps "several years" later.
_	Hall quotes "Peter Basset, esquire, which at the time of his death was his chamberlayn," as his authority for the statement that Henry V "died of a plurisis."
_	Gordon Stein has noted that "While the statement that Home was never caught in fraud has been made many times, it simply is not true...
_	Both told by male narrators, the suggested relationship between the stories may be summarized by the statement that both protagonists make in the story: "I had to do it...I would do it again!"
_	Decker introduces himself with the statement that he was an active member of the LDS Church for 19 years.
_	This includes the statement that she: "has not given up waiting to refashion her life.
_	In geometry, Hjelmslev's theorem, named after Johannes Hjelmslev, is the statement that if points P, Q, R... on a line are isometrically mapped to points
_	The British Museum has responded with the statement that "mistakes were made at that time."
_	As for the statement that "inertia originates in a kind of interaction between bodies", this too could be interpreted as true in the context of the effect.
_	In April 2014, a poll found that "support for an Australian republic has slumped to its lowest level in more than three decades"; namely, on the eve of the visit to Australia by the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge, and Prince George of Cambridge, 42% of those polled agreed with the statement that "Australia should become a republic", whereas 51% opposed.
_	It is often used in proofs to justify the statement that a line through a vertex of a triangle lying "inside" the triangle meets the side of the triangle opposite that vertex.
_	Commutativity of the diagram is then merely the statement that both orders of composition give the same result, exactly as required for ordinary categories.
_	There are some glimpses in the "Historia" of contemporary Scotland, such as the statement that the Eurasian beaver, which was soon to become extinct in Scotland, was still common around Loch Ness.
_	Errors in UDF cause UDF to abort which, in turn, aborts the statement that invoked the UDF.
_	The northern border published by the "Times Atlas" in 1954 more or less followed the principle of watershed of the Kuen Lun range from the Taghdumbash Pamir to the Yangi Dawan pass north of Kulanaldi but east of the Yangi Dawan Pass, the border deviated from the principle of the watershed of the Kuen Lun range on the edge of the highlands of Kashmir and skipped from the Kuen Lun watershed rather than continuing on the Kilian, Sanju-la and Hindutash border passes despite the statement that “The eastern (Kuenlun) range forms the southern boundary of Khotan”, in the 1890 Gazetteer of Kashmir and Ladak and is crossed by two other passes.
_	He also made a significant contribution to the development of aerodynamic theory with the statement that aerodynamic resistance varies as the square of the velocity.
_	During the video, Chamillionaire points out repeatedly that white kids now anticipate rap CDs coming out, and also makes the statement that when Hip Hop is Dead, white kids will be forced to listen to "hardcore polka".
_	This algebraic characterization of constructible numbers provides an important "necessary" condition for constructibility: if is constructible, then it is algebraic, and its minimal irreducible polynomial has degree a power of 2, which is equivalent to the statement that the field extension has dimension a power of 2.
_	"Until it has been refuted, I stand by the statement that characters can not be inherited that were acquired during the lifetime of the individual".
_	Prus closes his introduction with the statement that the narrative "relates to the eleventh century before Christ, when the Twentieth Dynasty fell and when, after the demise of the Son of the Sun the eternally living Ramses XIII, the throne was seized by, and the uraeus came to adorn the brow of, the eternally living Son of the Sun Sem-amen-Herhor, High Priest of Amon."
_	This is to certify that the statement that I signed was made up by James McParland, detective, and Harry Orchard, alias Tom Hogan.
_	For example, in ""The Theory of Political Economy"", Chapter II, the subsection on "Theory of Dimensions of Economic Quantities", Jevons makes the statement that "In the first place, pleasure and pain must be regarded as measured upon the same scale, and as having, therefore, the same dimensions, being quantities of the same kind, which can be added and subtracted..."
_	Admiral Harvey also said in the statement that after viewing the videos, he had lost confidence in Captain Honors’ ability to lead effectively.
_	Many preterists believe the immediate context seems to indicate the first view, the transfiguration, which immediately follows (; ; ). This view seems to satisfy that "some" disciples would see the glory of the Son of Man, but it does not satisfy the statement that "he will repay every man for what he has done".
_	The Legislature's 2003 amendments to Proposition 65 contained the statement that the changes "further the purposes of the Safe Drinking Water and Toxic Enforcement Act of 1986."
_	From a comparatively late date comes the statement that Hananiah b. Ḥakinai was one of the "ten martyrs" (see Zunz, "G. V." 2d ed., p. 150; see also "Masseket Aẓilut").
_	The god in time is a paradox just as much as the statement that "God is love" is a parody for an individual existing in time.
_	In "R v Morgentaler" (1988), Justice Bertha Wilson defined freedom of conscience as protecting "conscientious beliefs which are not religiously motivated", and balanced the preamble out with the statement that "the values entrenched in the Charter are those which characterize a free and democratic society".
_	Financial economists and academic papers will usually refer to all liabilities as debt, and the statement that equity plus liabilities equals assets is therefore an accounting identity (it is, by definition, true).
_	The character Lorien makes the statement that he is not "a First One" but rather "the First One", belonging to a nearly immortal race of great wisdom and power, and, according to himself, the first being to achieve sentience in the universe.
_	61% of respondents agreed with the statement that homosexuality is wrong and should be illegal.
_	The given numbers show the percentage of people agreeing with the statement that the named Chancellor was a good one:
_	It was evident from the statement that the decision to launch a military operation was taken without consulting the Governor of East Pakistan who was the only sane voice in the government.
_	However, beyond the statement that "he was worshipped in the ranks" we are told little about Mad Carew's military background.
_	In geometry, the statement that the angles opposite the equal sides of an isosceles triangle are themselves equal is known as the pons asinorum (; ), typically translated as "bridge of asses".
_	However, if one finds one single swan that is not white, deductive logic admits the conclusion that the statement that all swans are white is false.
_	The last main value is compassion, and this value is evident by the statement that the organization has released saying that they are devoted to the treatment and problem that is addiction.
_	The Ó Maoil Eoin were wrongly accorded kinship with the Uí Briúin, based on the statement that ""Maoliosa {son of Tairrdelbach Ua Conchobair}, Bishop of Roscommon, who had a son named Maol Eoin ... a quo O'Maoil Eoin, anglicised Malone.""
_	On July 15, 2009, the third day of questioning began with Senator John Cornyn (R-TX), who immediately went after her "wise Latina" remark once again, in trying to further clarify the difference between that statement and the statement that Sotomayor has compared hers to, in which former Supreme Court Justice Sandra Day O'Connor likened the decisions made by a "wise old woman" and a "wise old man".
_	More generally, for a given cardinal number and a stationary set , the statement (sometimes written or ) is the statement that there is a sequence such that
_	The more recent memo also recants the statement that the first amendment could be suspended.
_	He had shocked the court in British India in the 1820s with the statement that he did not believe in the sacredness of the Ganges.
_	The story ends with the statement that there are still strange occurrences in Crouch End, and that, very occasionally, people are known to "...lose their way.
_	Commutativity of the latter two diagrams is then the statement that compositions (as defined by the functions °) involving these distinguished individual "identity morphisms in C" behave exactly as per the identity rules for ordinary categories.
_	Another point of controversy surrounds the statement that Matthew wrote in the "Hebrew dialect", which in the Greek could refer to either Hebrew or Aramaic.
_	In 2008, a survey found that 36% of South Koreans disagreed with the statement that "Human beings, as we know them today, developed from earlier species of animals."
_	However, a year later, this decision was reversed, with the tests on plague bacteria being described as a "failure" and the statement that "brucellosis has not increased its reputation as a dangerous agent."
_	Dalit BJP leader Udit Raj, however, said of the statement that Ramdev had not said anything "wrong" against Dalits and that his intention was not "wrong."
_	In a federal lawsuit filed against Hillsborough County commissioners after they banned the county itself from recognizing gay pride displays, Redner included the statement that he is gay.
_	The Discovery Institute continued to misrepresent the book as banned in 2007, with the statement that:
_	In 1992, the U.S. Department of Energy declassified the statement that neptunium-237 "can be used for a nuclear explosive device".
_	Shortly after the release of the "Jeff Beck Group" album, the band was dissolved and Beck's management put out the statement that: "The fusion of the musical styles of the various members has been successful within the terms of individual musicians, but they didn't feel it had led to the creation of a new musical style with the strength they had originally sought."
_	Isherwood considered becoming an American citizen in 1945 but balked at taking an oath that included the statement that he would defend the country.
_	The Roman Catholic Church welcomed the Crown Office's clarification of the limited action taken against Boruc, particularly the statement that it "did not in any way refer to the act of blessing himself."
_	It was based on the statement that she "has willingly participated and contributed both directly and indirectly towards enhancing the ability of Al Qaeda."
_	Rumors indicated that Sawa had a contract dispute with New Line concerning the deduction of his salary; however, Perry resolved the issue with the statement that "it had everything to do with narrative, and nothing to do with money or Devon’s unwillingness to come back."
_	Logically, as the four castes can do either negative (demerit) or positive (merit) deeds, so will the wise reject the statement that only the Brahmins are the best caste.
_	On 12 July 2006, Faraj Hassan and Chafik Ayadi, both UK residents who had been listed under the regime since 2002, had their cases dismissed with the statement that:
_	According to Pyrrhonism, even the statement that nothing can be known is dogmatic.
_	In 1328, it was further elaborated, with the statement that ""Women cannot transmit a right which they do not possess"", to solve the dispute over the legitimate successor of Philip V's brother Charles IV of France (Edward III of England or Philip VI of France), though the former would have a stronger claim should proximity of blood be considered, which had never been the case in France since 987, instead as well of both agnatic-cognatic primogeniture or male-preference cognatic primogeniture and the resulting heirs.
_	For example, Fermat's last theorem (proved by Richard Taylor and Andrew Wiles) is equivalent to the statement that for an integer "n" at least 3, the only rational points of the curve "x" + "y" = "z" in P over Q are the obvious ones: [0,1,1] and [1,0,1]; [0,1,−1] and [1,0,−1] for "n" even; and [1,−1,0] for "n" odd.
_	The Ridgeback Club defended itself pointing to the statement that follows, "if a breeder finds this morally impossible [to cull the puppy] the puppy shall be homed..." as indication that culling is not mandatory, but preferred.
_	Probably we should connect with this the statement that Xenocrates called unity and duality ("monas" and "duas") deities, and characterised the former as the first male existence, ruling in heaven, as father and Zeus, as uneven number and spirit; the latter as female, as the mother of the gods, and as the soul of the universe which reigns over the mutable world under heaven, or, as others have it, that he named the Zeus who ever remains like himself, governing in the sphere of the immutable, the highest; the one who rules over the mutable, sublunary world, the last, or outermost.
_	Twice this statement is accompanied with the statement that "every man did that which was right in his own eyes", implying that the redactor is pro-monarchy, ( and ) and the epilogue, in which the tribe of Judah is assigned a leadership role, implies that this redaction took place in Judah.
_	These lines are less scathing than the repetition of the anecdote of the Ephesian lady (from Juvenal) who would meet her lovers at her husband's tomb, the statement that women envy the greatness of Eve's sin, and that a prostitute is far better than a wife, since she only damns the soul, while a wife will damn the soul and destroy all happiness.
